





Global Diversified Futures Fund L.p. 8-k - Form 8 K Special Events Filing - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   >      > GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. 8-K

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Global Diversified Futures Fund L.p. 8-k
Form 8 K Special Events Filing



You are currently viewing:
 This  involves GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P.. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. 8-K Date: 11/4/2010 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










     

UNITED
STATES

SECURITIES
AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington,
D.C. 20549

 

FORM
8-K

 

CURRENT
REPORT

 

Pursuant
to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934

 

 

Date of
Report (Date of earliest event
reported):                                         October
29, 2010

 

   
  GLOBAL
DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P.  
    

(Exact
name of registrant as specified in its charter)

 

 

 




 
   New York  



  
   000-30455    



  
  13-4015586   





(State or
other



(Commission
File



(IRS
Employer





jurisdiction
of



Number)



Identification
No.)





incorporation)



 



 




 

c/o Ceres
Managed Futures LLC

522 Fifth
Avenue - 14th Floor

New York,
New York 10036

(Address
and Zip Code of principal executive offices)

 

Registrant’s
telephone number, including area
code:                                                
(212) 296-1999

 

(Former
name or former address, if changed since last report)

 

 

Check the
appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to
simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant
under any of the following provisions (see   General
Instruction A.2. below):

 

o
      Written
communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17
CFR 230.425)

 

o
      Soliciting
material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR
240.14a-12)

 

o
      Pre-commencement
communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17
CFR 240.14d-2(b))

 

o
      Pre-commencement
communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17
CFR 240.13e-4(c))

 

 

 

  

 

 
  

Item
1.01                      Entry
into a Material Definitive Agreement.

 

Ceres
Managed Futures LLC, the general partner of the Registrant, and the
Registrant have entered into a management agreement dated as of
October 29, 2010 (the “Management Agreement”) with
Blackwater Capital Management LLC (the “Advisor”), a
Delaware limited liability company, pursuant to which the Advisor
shall manage the portion of the Registrant’s assets allocated
to it.

 

Pursuant
to the Management Agreement, the Registrant pays the Advisor a
monthly management fee equal to 1.25% per year of the month-end net
assets allocated to the Advisor.  The Advisor also
receives an annual incentive fee equal to 20% of new trading
profits (as defined in the attached Management Agreement) earned by
the Advisor in each calendar year.

 

The
Management Agreement expires on June 30th of each year and may be
renewed by the general partner, in its sole discretion, for
additional one-year periods upon notice to the Advisor not less
than 30 days prior to the expiration of the previous
period.

 

The
Management Agreement is filed herewith as Exhibit 10.9.

 
 

Item 9.01                      Financial
Statements and Exhibits.

 

(d)           Exhibits.

 

The
following exhibit is filed herewith.

 




Exhibit No.

 



Description





 10.9



Management
Agreement dated October 29, 2010 by and among the Registrant, Ceres
Managed Futures LLC and Blackwater Capital Management
LLC




 

 

 

 

 

 

  

 

  

SIGNATURES

 

Pursuant
to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the
registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf
by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 

 

 

GLOBAL
DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P.

 

By: Ceres
Managed Futures LLC, General Partner

 

 

 

By  
/s/ Walter
Davis                                

 Walter
Davis

 President
and Director

 

 

By  
/s/ Jennifer
Magro                           

  Jennifer
Magro




 



Chief
Financial Officer, Secretary and Director




 

Date:  November
4, 2010

 

    

 

 

 

 


 

Exhibit
10.9

 

 

M
ANAGEMENT
AGREEMENT

 

AGREEMENT
made as of the 29th day of October, 2010 among CERES MANAGED
FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company
(“CMF” or the “General Partner”), GLOBAL
DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the
“Partnership”) and BLACKWATER CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC, a
Delaware limited liability company (“Blackwater” or the
“Advisor”).

 

W
I
T N E S S E T
H :

 

WHEREAS,
CMF is the general partner of the Partnership, a limited
partnership organized for the purpose of speculative trading of
commodity interests, including futures contracts, options and
forward contracts with the objective of achieving substantial
capital appreciation, such trading to be conducted directly or
through investment in Blackwater Master Fund L.P., a Delaware
limited partnership (the “Master Fund”) of which CMF is
the general partner and Blackwater is the advisor; and

 

WHEREAS,
the Limited Partnership Agreement establishing the Partnership (the
“Limited Partnership Agreement”) permits CMF to
delegate to one or more commodity trading advisors CMF’s
authority to make trading decisions for the Partnership;
and

 

WHEREAS,
the Advisor is registered as a commodity trading advisor with the
Commodity Futures Trading Commission (“CFTC”) and is a
member of the National Futures Association (“NFA”);
and

 

WHEREAS,
CMF is registered as a commodity pool operator with the CFTC and is
a member of the NFA; and

 

WHEREAS,
CMF, the Partnership and the Advisor wish to enter into this
Agreement in order to set forth the terms and conditions upon which
the Advisor will render and implement advisory services in
connection with the conduct by the Partnership of its commodity
trading activities during the term of this Agreement;

 

NOW,
THEREFORE, the parties agree as follows:

 

1.  
DUTIES OF THE ADVISOR .  (a) For the period and on
the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Advisor shall have
sole authority and responsibility, as one of the
Partnership’s agents and attorneys-in-fact, for directing the
investment and reinvestment of the assets and funds of the
Partnership allocated to it from time to time by the General
Partner in commodity interests, including commodity futures
contracts, options, forward contracts, swaps and other derivative
instruments.  All such trading on behalf of the
Partnership shall be in accordance with the trading policies set
forth in the Partnership’s Prospectus and Disclosure Document
dated November 25, 1998, as supplemented (the
“Prospectus”), as such trading policies may be changed
from time to time upon receipt by the Advisor of prior written
notice of such change, and pursuant to the trading strategy
selected by CMF to be utilized by the Advisor in managing the
Partnership’s assets.  CMF has initially selected
the Advisor’s Blackwater Global Program (the
“Program”), as described in Appendix A attached hereto,
to manage the Partnership’s assets allocated to
it.  Any open positions or other investments at the time
of receipt of such notice of a change in trading policy shall not
be deemed to violate the changed policy and shall be closed or sold
in the ordinary course of trading.  The Advisor may not
deviate from the trading policies set forth in the Prospectus
without the prior written consent of the Partnership given by
CMF.  The Advisor makes no representation or warranty
that the trading to be directed by it for the Partnership will be
profitable or will not incur losses.

 

 

 

  

 

 

(b)
  CMF acknowledges receipt of the description of the Program,
attached hereto as Appendix A.  All trades made by the
Advisor for the account of the Partnership shall be made through
such commodity broker or brokers as CMF shall direct, and the
Advisor shall have no authority or responsibility for selecting or
supervising any such broker in connection with the execution,
clearance or confirmation of transactions for the Partnership or
for the negotiation of brokerage rates charged
therefor.  However, the Advisor, with the prior written
permission (by either original or fax copy) of CMF, may direct any
and all trades in commodity futures and options to a futures
commission merchant or independent floor broker it chooses for
execution with instructions to give-up the trades to the broker
designated by CMF, provided that the futures commission merchant or
independent floor broker and any give-up or floor brokerage fees
are approved in advance by CMF.  All give-up or similar
fees relating to the foregoing shall be paid by the Partnership
after all parties have executed the relevant give-up agreements (by
either original or fax copy).

 

(c)
  The initial allocation of the Partnership’s assets to
the Advisor will be made to the Program, as described in Appendix A
attached hereto.  In the event the Advisor wishes to use
a trading system or methodology other than or in addition to the
Program in connection with its trading for the Partnership, either
in whole or in part, it may not do so unless the Advisor gives CMF
prior written notice of its intention to utilize such different
trading system or methodology and CMF consents thereto in
writing.  In addition, the Advisor will provide five
days’ prior written notice to CMF of any change in the
trading system or methodology to be utilized for the Partnership
which the Advisor deems material.  If the Advisor deems
such change in system or methodology or in markets traded to be
material, the changed system or methodology or markets traded will
not be utilized for the Partnership without the prior written
consent of CMF.  In addition, the Advisor will notify CMF
of any changes to the trading system or methodology that would
cause the description of the trading strategy or methods described
in Appendix A to be materially inaccurate.  Further, the
Advisor will provide the Partnership with a current list of all
commodity interests to be traded for the Partnership’s
account and the Advisor will not trade any additional commodity
interests for such account without providing notice thereof to CMF
and receiving CMF’s written approval.  The Advisor
also agrees to provide CMF, on a monthly basis, with a written
report of the assets under the Advisor’s management together
with all other matters deemed by the Advisor to be material changes
to its business not previously reported to CMF.  The
Advisor further agrees that it will convert foreign currency
balances (not required to margin positions denominated in a foreign
currency) to U.S. dollars no less frequently than
monthly.  U.S. dollar equivalents in individual foreign
currencies of more than $100,000 will be converted to U.S. dollars
within one business day after such funds are no longer needed to
margin foreign positions.

 

- 2
-

 

  

 

 

(d)
  The Advisor agrees to make all material disclosures to the
Partnership regarding itself and its principals as defined in Part
4 of the CFTC’s regulations (“principals”),
members, directors, officers and employees, their trading
performance and general trading methods, its customer accounts (but
not the identities of or identifying information with respect to
its customers) and otherwise as are required in the reasonable
judgment of CMF to be made in any filings required by Federal or
State law or NFA rule or order.  Notwithstanding Sections
1(d) and 4(d) of this Agreement, the Advisor is not required to
disclose the actual trading results of proprietary accounts of the
Advisor or its principals unless CMF reasonably determines that
such disclosure is required in order to fulfill its fiduciary
obligations to the Partnership or the reporting, filing or other
obligations imposed on it by Federal or State law or NFA rule or
order.  The Partnership and CMF acknowledge that the
trading advice to be provided by the Advisor is a property right
belonging to the Advisor and that they will keep all such advice
confidential.

 

(e)
  The Advisor understands and agrees that CMF may designate
other trading advisors for the Partnership and apportion or
reapportion to such other trading advisors the management of an
amount of Net Assets (as defined in Section 3(b) hereof) as it
shall determine in its absolute discretion.  The
designation of other trading advisors and the apportionment or
reapportionment of Net Assets to any such trading advisors pursuant
to this Section 1 shall neither terminate this Agreement nor modify
in any regard the respective rights and obligations of the parties
hereunder.

 

(f)
  CMF may, from time to time, in its absolute discretion,
select additional trading advisors and reapportion funds among the
trading advisors for the Partnership as it deems
appropriate.  CMF shall use its best efforts to make
reapportionments, if any, as of the first day of a
month.  The Advisor agrees that it may be called upon at
any time promptly to liquidate positions in CMF’s sole
discretion so that CMF may reallocate the Partnership’s
assets, meet margin calls on the Partnership’s account, fund
redemptions, or for any other reason, except that CMF will not
require the liquidation of specific positions by the
Advisor.  CMF will use its best efforts to give two
days’ prior notice to the Advisor of any reallocations or
liquidations.

 

(g)
  The Advisor will not be liable for trading losses in the
Partnership’s account including losses caused by errors;
provided, however, that (i) the Advisor will be liable to the
Partnership with respect to losses incurred due to errors committed
or caused by it or any of its principals or employees in
communicating improper trading instructions or orders to any broker
on behalf of the Partnership and (ii) the Advisor will be liable to
the Partnership with respect to losses incurred due to errors
committed or caused by any executing broker (other than any CMF
affiliate) selected by the Advisor.

 

2.  
INDEPENDENCE OF THE ADVISOR .  For all purposes
herein, the Advisor shall be deemed to be an independent contractor
and, unless otherwise expressly provided or authorized, shall have
no authority to act for or represent the Partnership in any way and
shall not be deemed an agent, promoter or sponsor of the
Partnership, CMF, or any other trading advisor.  The
Advisor shall not be responsible to the Partnership, the General
Partner, any trading advisor or any limited partners for any acts
or omissions of any other trading advisor to the
Partnership.

 

- 3
-

 

  

 

 

3.  
COMPENSATION .  (a) In consideration of and as
compensation for all of the services to be rendered by the Advisor
to the Partnership under this Agreement, the Partnership shall pay
the Advisor (i) an annual incentive fee equal to 20% of New Trading
Profits (as such term is defined below) earned by the Advisor for
the Partnership and (ii) a monthly fee for professional management
services equal to 1.25% per year of the month-end Net Assets of the
Partnership allocated to the Advisor (computed monthly by
multiplying the Partnership’s Net Assets allocated to the
Advisor as of the last business day of each month by 1.25% and
multiplying the result thereof by the ratio which the total number
of calendar days in that month bears to the total number of
calendar days in the year).

 

(b)
  “Net Assets” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 7(d)(1) of the Limited Partnership Agreement dated as of
June 15, 1998 and without regard to further amendments thereto,
provided that in determining the Net Assets of the Partnership on
any date, no adjustment shall be made to reflect any distributions,
redemptions or incentive fees payable as of the date of such
determination.

 

(c)
  “New Trading Profits” shall mean the excess, if
any, of Net Assets managed by the Advisor at the end of the fiscal
period over Net Assets managed by the Advisor at the end of the
highest previous fiscal period or Net Assets allocated to the
Advisor at the date trading commences, whichever is higher, and as
further adjusted to eliminate the effect on Net Assets resulting
from new capital contributions, redemptions, reallocations or
capital distributions, if any, made during the fiscal period
decreased by interest or other income, not directly related to
trading activity, earned on the Partnership’s assets during
the fiscal period, whether the assets are held separately or in
margin accounts.  Ongoing expenses will be attributed to
the Advisor based on the Advisor’s proportionate share of Net
Assets.  Ongoing expenses will not include expenses of
litigation not involving the activities of the Advisor on behalf of
the Partnership.  No incentive fee shall be paid until
after December 31, 2010, which fee shall be based on New Trading
Profits earned by the Advisor on behalf of the
Partnership.  Interest income earned, if any, will not be
taken into account in computing New Trading Profits earned by the
Advisor.  If Net Assets allocated to the Advisor are
reduced due to redemptions, distributions or reallocations (net of
additions), there will be a corresponding proportional reduction in
the related loss carryforward amount that must be recouped before
the Advisor is eligible to receive another incentive
fee.

 

(d)
  Annual incentive fees and monthly management fees shall be
paid within twenty (20) business days following the end of the
period for which such fee is payable.  In the event of
the termination of this Agreement as of any date which shall not be
the end of a calendar year or month, as the case may be, the annual
incentive fee shall be computed as if the effective date of
termination were the last day of the then current year and the
monthly management fee shall be prorated to the effective date of
termination.  If, during any month, the Partnership does
not conduct business operations or the Advisor is unable to provide
the services contemplated herein for more than two successive
business days, the monthly management fee shall be prorated by the
ratio which the number of business days during which CMF conducted
the Partnership’s business operations or utilized the
Advisor’s services bears in the month to the total number of
business days in such month.

 

(e)
  The provisions of this Section 3 shall survive the
termination of this Agreement.

 

- 4
-

 

  

 

 

4.  
RIGHT TO ENGAGE IN OTHER ACTIVITIES .  (a) The
services provided by the Advisor hereunder are not to be deemed
exclusive.  CMF on its own behalf and on behalf of the
Partnership acknowledges that, subject to the terms of this
Agreement, the Advisor and its officers, directors, employees and
members, may render advisory, consulting and management services to
other clients and accounts.  The Advisor and its
officers, directors, employees and members shall be free to trade
for their own accounts and to advise other investors and manage
other commodity accounts during the term of this Agreement and to
use the same information, computer programs and trading strategies,
programs or formulas which they obtain, produce or utilize in the
performance of services to CMF for the
Partnership.  However, the Advisor represents, warrants
and agrees that it believes the rendering of such consulting,
advisory and management services to other accou


 








 














Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Related Companies

AAA Energy Opportunities Fund LLC
APM - Eckhardt Futures Fund, L.P.
APMEX Physical - 1 oz. Gold Redeemable Trust
Aaa Capital Energy Fund L.P. II
Ais Futures Fund Iv Lp
AlphaMetrix Managed Futures III LLC (AlphaMetrix WC Diversified Series)
AlphaMetrix Managed Futures LLC
Altegris QIM Futures Fund, L.P.
Altegris Winton Futures Fund, L.P.
Altin:Fund, Limited Partnership
Aspect FuturesAccess LLC
Aspen Diversified Fund LLC
Aspirity Holdings Llc
Atlas Futures Fund Limited Partnership
Beacon Financial Futures Fund Lp



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.





      Loading...
    





Former Names
CITIGROUP GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L P (until 2009-09-30) SALOMON SMITH BARNEY GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L P (until 2008-08-14)Standard IndustryClassification
Commodity contracts brokers & dealersAddress

C/O Citigroup Managed Futures Llc, New York, NY 10036
Phone
212-296-1999



Sample Contracts



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2016 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited
(March 28th, 2017)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2016 Aspect Capital Ltd.
(March 28th, 2017)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amendment to the Management Agreement
(September 20th, 2016)
This AMENDMENT dated 15 September 2016 to the MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT made as of the 11th day of August 2016 (the "Management Agreement"), among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and PGR CAPITAL LLP, a United Kingdom limited liability partnership ("PGR" or the "Advisor").



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Management Agreement
(August 17th, 2016)
This AGREEMENT made as of the 11th day of August, 2016 (the "Agreement"), is by and among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. (formerly Citigroup Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.), a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and PGR CAPITAL LLP, a United Kingdom limited liability partnership ("PGR" or the "Advisor").



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amended and Restated Alternative Investment Selling Agent Agreement
(March 8th, 2016)
This Amended and Restated Alternative Investment Selling Agent Agreement ("Agreement") is dated as of March 3, 2016, by and among each of the limited partnerships listed on Schedule 1 hereto (each, a "Partnership," and together, the "Partnerships"), Ceres Managed Futures LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "General Partner"), and Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, currently doing business as Morgan Stanley Wealth Management ("MSSB" or "Placement Agent").  Partnerships may be added to this Agreement upon the agreement of the General Partner and MSSB, pursuant to the form of joinder attached as Appendix B to this Agreement.  The listing of such partnership on Schedule 1 hereto shall be evidence of such agreement.  This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements between each Partnership, MSSB and the General Partner.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amendment No. 2 to the Limited Partnership Agreement of Global Diversified
Futures Fund L.P. (Formerly Citigroup Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.)
Dated as of June 15, 1998 and as Amended by Amendment No. 1 Dated as of August
8, 2014 (The "Agreement")
(January 6th, 2016)
WHEREAS, consistent with the General Partner's authority to amend the Agreement without the consent of the Limited Partners under Paragraph 17(a), the Agreement shall be amended as follows:



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Morgan Stanley & Co. Llc Listed Derivatives
(November 4th, 2015)
This Agreement governs the service ("Service") made available to each Fund set forth in Annex A hereto (each such Fund, the "Customer") by Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC ("MS&Co.") and is effective as of June 1, 2015.  This Agreement is in addition to and supplements Customer's Commodity Futures Customer Agreement (the "Futures Agreement").  Unless otherwise specified in this Agreement, all capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Futures Agreement and references herein and in the Futures Agreement to the "Agreement" shall be construed to mean the Futures Agreement as amended and supplemented by this Agreement.  Except as otherwise modified by this Agreement, the terms and conditions of the Futures Agreement remain in full force and effect.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Second Amendment to the Management Agreement
(August 6th, 2015)
This SECOND AMENDMENT, dated as of the 1st day of August 2015 to the MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT made as of the 1st day of October 2005, as amended by that certain Amendment to the Management Agreement dated as of the 1st day of June 2013 (as so amended, the "Management Agreement"), among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC (formerly, Citigroup Managed Futures LLC), a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. (formerly, Salomon Smith Barney Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.), a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and ALTIS PARTNERS (JERSEY) LIMITED, a States of Jersey, Channel Islands corporation (the "Advisor" or "Altis", and together with CMF and the Partnership, the "Parties").  Capitalized terms not defined herein have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Management Agreement.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amended & Restated Master Services Agreement
(August 6th, 2015)
This Amended & Restated Master Services Agreement (the "Agreement") is entered into and effective as of March 31, 2015 (the "Effective Date") by and among:



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amendment to the Management Agreement
(August 6th, 2015)
This AMENDMENT dated as of the 1st day of June, 2013 to the MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT made as of the 1st day of October, 2005 (the "Management Agreement"), among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC (formerly, Citigroup Managed Futures LLC), a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. (formerly, Salomon Smith Barney Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.), a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited, a States of Jersey, Channel Islands corporation (the "Advisor" or "Altis," all parties together, the "Parties").  Capitalized terms not defined herein have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Management Agreement.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2014 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited
(March 30th, 2015)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2014 Aspect Capital Ltd.
(March 30th, 2015)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2014 Blackwater Capital Management, LLC
(March 30th, 2015)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
August 8, 2014 Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC
(August 13th, 2014)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
April 7, 2014 Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC
(May 14th, 2014)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Amendment No. 1 to the Management Agreement
(May 14th, 2014)
This AMENDMENT NO. 1 dated as of the 1st day of December, 2013 to the MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT made as of the 29th day of October, 2010 (the Management Agreement), among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (CMF), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the Partnership) and BLACKWATER CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor) (all parties together, the Parties). Capitalized terms not defined herein have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Management Agreement.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Important Information About Procedures for Opening a New Account or
Establishing a New Customer Relationship
(November 14th, 2013)
To help the U.S. Government prevent the funding of terrorism and money laundering activities, federal law requires all U.S. financial institutions to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each customer that opens an account.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Alternative Investment Selling Agent Agreement
(November 14th, 2013)
This Alternative Investment Selling Agent Agreement (Agreement) is dated as of November 12, 2013, by and among each of the limited partnerships listed on Schedule 1 hereto (each, a Partnership, and together, the Partnerships), Ceres Managed Futures LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the General Partner), and Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, currently doing business as Morgan Stanley Wealth Management (MSSB). Partnerships may be added to this Agreement upon the agreement of the General Partner and MSSB. The listing of such partnership on Schedule 1 hereto shall be evidence of such agreement. This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements between each Partnership, MSSB and the General Partner.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2012 Waypoint Capital Management
(March 27th, 2013)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2012 Blackwater Capital Management, LLC
(March 27th, 2013)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2012 Aspect Capital Ltd.
(March 27th, 2013)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2012 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited
(March 27th, 2013)




Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2010 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited 2 Hill Street St Helier, Jersey
Channel Islands JE2 4UA Attention: Mr. Stephen Hedgecock Dear Mr. Hedgecock:
(March 31st, 2011)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2011 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Re: Management Agreement Renewals
(March 31st, 2011)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2011 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2010 Waypoint Capital Management 23 Greene St. Suite 210 Huntington,
N.Y. 11743 Attn: Mr. Robert Calabretta Re: Management Agreement Renewals Dear
Mr. Calabretta:
(March 31st, 2011)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2011 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 1, 2010 Aspect Capital Ltd. Nations House  8th Floor 103 Wigmore Street
London W1U 1QS, U.K. Attention: Mr. Anthony Todd Re: Management Agreement
Renewals Dear Mr. Todd:
(March 31st, 2011)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2011 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Management Agreement
(December 1st, 2010)
AGREEMENT made as of the 30th day of November, 2010 among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF" or the "General Partner"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and SASCO ENERGY PARTNERS LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Sasco" or the "Advisor").



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Management Agreement
(November 4th, 2010)
AGREEMENT made as of the 29th day of October, 2010 among CERES MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("CMF" or the "General Partner"), GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the "Partnership") and BLACKWATER CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Blackwater" or the "Advisor").



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 24, 2009 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited 2 Hill Street St Helier Jersey
Channel Islands JE2 4UA Attention: Mr. Richard F. Plane Dear Mr. Plane:
(March 31st, 2010)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2010 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 9, 2009 Waypoint Capital Management 23 Green St.  Suite 210 Huntington,
N.Y. 11743 Attention: Mr. Robert Calabretta Dear Mr. Calabretta:
(March 31st, 2010)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2010 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 9, 2009 Aspect Capital Ltd. Nations House  8th Floor 103 Wigmore Street
London W1U 1QS, U.K. Attention: Mr. Anthony Todd Dear Mr. Todd:
(March 31st, 2010)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2010 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 9, 2009 Campbell & Company, Inc. 2850 Quarry Lake Drive Baltimore, MD
21209 Attn: Ms. Theresa Becks Dear Ms. Becks:
(March 31st, 2010)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2010 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Joinder Agreement
(August 14th, 2009)
This Joinder Agreement dated as of June 1, 2009 (this Joinder Agreement), by and among Citigroup Managed Futures LLC (CMF), as the general partner or trading manager of, and on behalf of, the investment funds identified on the schedule attached as Exhibit A to this agreement (each, a Fund and collectively, the Funds), Citigroup Global Markets Inc. (on behalf of itself and its Smith Barney division) (CGMI) and Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC (the Joining Party) amends the Agency and/or Selling Agreements, as applicable, listed on Exhibit A, including any annexes thereto to which CGMI is a party (each, an Agency Agreement and collectively, the Agency Agreements), by and among CMF, the Funds, CGMI and the other parties thereto.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
June 5, 2008 Campbell & Company, Inc. Court Tower Building 210 West
Pennsylvania Avenue Suite 770 Towson, MD 21204 Attn: Ms. Terry Becks Dear Ms.
Becks:
(March 31st, 2009)
We are writing with respect to your management agreements concerning the commodity pools to which reference is made below (the Management Agreements). We are extending the term of the Management Agreements through June 30, 2009 and all other provisions of the Management Agreements will remain unchanged.



Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. –
Management Agreement
(March 31st, 2009)
AGREEMENT made as of the 29 day of September, 2008 among CITIGROUP MANAGED FUTURES LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (CMF), CITIGROUP GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P., a New York limited partnership (the Partnership) and WAYPOINT CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor).













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 2:50 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. is fund launched and managed by Ceres Managed Futures LLC. The fund engages, directly or indirectly, in the speculative trading of a diversified portfolio of commodity interests, including futures, option, swap and forward contracts on United States exchanges and certain foreign exchanges. Its sectors traded include currencies, energy, grains, indices, metals, softs, lumber, livestock and U.S. and non U.S. interest rates. The fund was formerly known as Citigroup Global Diversified Futures Fund. Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. was formed on June 15, 1998 and is domiciled in the United States.


522 Fifth Avenue14th FloorNew York, NY 10036United StatesFounded in 1998



Phone: 212-296-1999








Key Executives for Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.




Mr. Patrick T. Egan


      	President of Ceres Managed Futures LLC and Director of Ceres Managed Futures LLC
      


Age: 47
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. Key Developments

General Partner of Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P. Appoints Ernst & Young LLP in the Place of Deloitte & Touche LLP
Dec 7 16
On December 1, 2016, the Board of Directors of the General Partner, on behalf of the Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.dismissed Deloitte & Touche LLP (Deloitte") as the registered public accounting firm for the Registrant, effective as of the close of business on the day the Registrant's audited financial statements for the 2016 fiscal year end are filed, which is expected to be on or before March 31, 2017. On December 1, 2016, the Board of Directors of the General Partner, on behalf of the Registrant, approved the engagement of Ernst & Young LLP (EY") as the independent registered public accounting firm for the Registrant.


Ceres Managed Futures LLC Announces Management Changes
Mar 1 16
Ceres Managed Futures LLC announced that effective February 24, 2016, Edmond Moriarty and Kevin Klingert resigned as directors of the General Partner.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Patrick T. Egan: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 2:50 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Patrick T. Egan  President of Ceres Managed Futures LLC and Director of Ceres Managed Futures LLC, Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 6 Board Members in 6 different organizations across 1 different industries.See Board Relationships47--
Background

		Mr. Patrick T. Egan has been the President and Chairman at Ceres Managed Futures LLC since October 1, 2014. Mr. Egan serves as the Co-Chief Investment Officer for Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC’s Managed Futures Department. From April 2007 to June 2009, Mr. Egan was employed by MS & Co., where his responsibilities included Head of Due Diligence and Manager Research for Morgan Stanley’s Managed Futures Department.   From March 1993 to April 2007, Mr. Egan was employed ... by Morgan Stanley DW Inc., where his initial responsibilities included serving as an analyst and manager within the Managed Futures Department, with primary responsibilities for product development, due diligence, investment analysis and risk management of its commodity pools and later included serving as Head of Due Diligence and Manager Research for Morgan Stanley’s Managed Futures Department.   From February 1998 through April 2007, Mr. Egan was registered as an associated person of Morgan Stanley DW Inc. From September 2013 to May 2014, Mr. Egan served as a Vice President of Morgan Stanley Strategies LLC (formerly known as Morgan Stanley GWM Feeder Strategies LLC). From June 2009 to December 2014, Mr. Egan was employed by Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC where his responsibilities included serving as Executive Director and as Co-Chief Investment Officer for Morgan Stanley Managed Futures from June 2009 through June 2011 and as Chief Risk Officer for Morgan Stanley Managed Futures from June 2011 to October 2014 and was responsible for the day-to-day operations and management.  From November 2010 to October 2014, Mr. Egan was registered as an associated person of Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC. He served as the Head of Due Diligence & Manager Research for Morgan Stanley’s Managed Futures Department since October 2003 until June 2009. From March 1993 to September 2003, Mr. Egan was an Analyst and Manager within the Managed Futures Department for Morgan Stanley DW Inc., and its predecessor firm, Dean Witter Reynolds, Inc. He began his career in August 1991, joining Dean Witter Intercapital and served there until March 1993 when he joined Morgan Stanley’s Managed Futures Department. Mr. Egan serves as an Executive Director at Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC. He has been a Director of Citigroup Managed Futures LLC since 2010 and Ceres Managed Futures LLC since December 2010. He serves as a Director of Polaris Futures Fund LP. Mr. Egan served as a Director of Managed Funds Association from November 2004 to October 2006 and from November 2006 to October 2008.  Mr. Egan became registered as a swap Associated Person of the Ceres Managed Futures LLC since August 2013 and has been its Principal since December 2010. Mr. Egan has been an Associate Member of the NFA since December 1997.  He received a Bachelor of Business Administration with a concentration in Finance from the University of Notre Dame in May 1991.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
522 Fifth AvenueNew York, New York 10036United StatesPhone: 212-296-1999Fax: --
Board Members Memberships
President of Ceres Managed Futures LLC and Director of Ceres Managed Futures LLCGlobal Diversified Futures Fund L.P.President and Chairman of the BoardCeres Managed Futures LLCDirectorPolaris Futures Fund LP2010-PresentDirector of Ceres Managed Futures LLCDiversified Multi Advisor Futures Fund L.P. II2010-PresentDirector of Citigroup Managed Futures LLCFairfield Futures Fund LP II2010-PresentChairman & President - Ceres Managed Futures LLCMorgan Stanley Smith Barney BHM I, LLC
Education
BBA 1991University of Notre Dame
Other Affiliations
Diversified Multi Advisor Futures Fund L.P. IIUniversity of Notre DameCeres Managed Futures LLCManaged Funds AssociationFairfield Futures Fund LP IIPolaris Futures Fund LPMorgan Stanley Smith Barney BHM I, LLC


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Global Diversified Futures Fund L.P., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.












Hedge Funds - Hedge Funds - Meridian Global Diversified Fund, L.P.



























Hedge Funds
Hedge Funds Directory - Best Hedge Funds List of Top Hedge Fund Companies











 




 









Hedge FundsRegisterAdd Your Listing FreeLoginLink ExchangeContact Us

















RESOURCE

Investment Adviser 









Hedge Funds


A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z | 0-9


 Hedge Funds 
 Search 
 Add Entry 





Hedge Fund Company in 

        Stamford,  CONNECTICUT,  USA  
        
        
Meridian Global Diversified Fund, L.P. 










Google Map
1177 Summer Street
Stamford
CONNECTICUT
6905
USA
Phone: 888-653-6040
Website
Meridian Global Diversified Fund is a managed futures fund that invests in exchange traded commodities and financial futures contracts. The fund is a National Futures Association registered Commodity Trading Advisor that provides investors with liquidity and transparency in a fully regulated environment.? Our trading methodology was developed over many years of extensive and in-depth research and analysis.While the fund provides exceptional returns and return-to-risk ratios as a stand alone product, the true benefit is  through providing diversification to an existing traditional stock, bond, and real estate portfolio.  Our research has shown that a small allocation into Meridian will reduce risk and increase returns of a traditional portfolio.Source: www.meridian-assetmanagement.com/index.asp 







            
    Hits:  167    





<< Start
< Prev
Next >
End >>


<< Start
< Prev
Next >
End >>





Rate now:  

1
2
3
4
5
Select












What to write in a review?Share your thoughts and experiences with this company. But please be polite and solve your problems first by getting in contact with the company.


Name:  

Email:  


		 					Show my email 		 				






		 					Title: 		 				






		 					Text: 		 				
























Report Listing 

  

























	 				 	Powered by Hedge Funds | sitemap.xml













	TACTICAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. - 10-K - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.














    
 
Leading edge information on innovative call center & workforce optimization solutions.
 





 

 
 



 















     
Read
News
Research
Watch
Try
Learn More
Contact





















  










Industry News
























[March 27, 2013]


TACTICAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. - 10-K - Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.

(Edgar Glimpses Via Acquire Media NewsEdge) Overview

The Partnership, directly and through its investment in the Funds, aims to
achieve substantial capital appreciation and permit investors to diversify a
traditionally structured stock and bond portfolio. The Partnership attempts to
accomplish its objectives through speculative trading in U.S. and international
markets for currencies, interest rates, stock indices, agricultural and energy
products and precious and base metals directly, or through investments in the
Funds. The Partnership may employ futures, swaps, options on futures, and
forward contracts in those markets.



 


The General Partner manages all business of the Partnership/Funds. The General
Partner has delegated its responsibility for the investment of the Partnership's
assets to the Advisors. The General Partner employs a team of approximately 37
professionals whose primary emphasis is on attempting to maintain quality
control among the Advisors to the funds operated or managed by the General
Partner. A full-time staff of due diligence professionals use state-of-the-art
technology and on-site evaluations to monitor new and existing futures money
managers. The accounting and operations staff provides processing of
subscriptions and redemptions and reporting to limited partners and regulatory
authorities. The General Partner also includes staff involved in marketing and
sales support. In selecting the Advisors for the Partnership, the General
Partner considered past performance, trading style, volatility of markets traded
and fee requirements.

Responsibilities of the General Partner include:

 • due diligence examinations of the Advisors;

 • selection, appointment and termination of the Advisors;

 • negotiation of the management agreements; and

 • monitoring the activity of the Advisors.

In addition, the General Partner prepares the books and records and provides the
administrative and compliance services that are required by law or regulation
from time to time in connection with the operation of the Partnership. These
services include the preparation of required books and records and reports to
limited partners, government agencies and regulators; computation of net asset
value; calculation of fees; assistance in connection with subscriptions,
redemptions and limited partner communications; and preparation of offering
documents and sales literature.

While the Partnership and the Funds have the right to seek lower commission
rates from other commodity brokers at any time, the General Partner believes
that the customer agreements and other arrangements with the commodity broker
are fair, reasonable and competitive.

The programs traded by each Advisor on behalf of the Partnership are: Drury -
Diversified Trend-Following Program, Graham - K4D-15V Program ("K4D"), JWH -
Global Analytics Program, Aspect - Diversified Program, CFM - Discus Program,
Willowbridge - Argo Trading System ("Argo"), Krom River - Commodity Program and
Altis - Global Futures Portfolio Program. Effective January 1, 2013,
Willowbridge trades its w/Praxis Futures Trading Approach on behalf of the
Partnership. CFM ceased trading the Partnership's assets on December 31, 2012.
As of December 31, 2012 and September 30, 2012, the Partnership's assets were
allocated among the Advisors in the following approximate

 29

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

percentages:

 Advisor December 31, 2012 September 30, 2012
 Drury Capital, Inc. 16 % 15 %
 Graham Capital Management, L.P. 7 % 9 %
 John W. Henry & Company, Inc. - % 4 %
 Aspect Management (Cayman) Limited 20 % 19 %
 Capital Fund Management S.A. 13 % 14 %
 Willowbridge Associates Inc. 6 % 5 %
 Krom River Trading Program 19 % 17 %
 Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited 19 % 17 %

No assurance is given that an Advisor's trading program will be profitable or
that it will not experience losses.

Drury Capital, Inc.

Drury trades its Diversified Trend-Following Program on behalf of Drury Master.
The Diversified Trend-Following program is systematic and technical. Drury may
exercise judgment regarding liquidity issues. Systematic traders rely primarily
on trading programs or models that generate trading signals. The systems
utilized to generate trading signals are changed from time to time (although
generally infrequently), but the trading instructions generated by the system
being used are followed without significant additional analysis or
interpretation.

The Diversified Trend-Following Program is built on elements of trend-following
and diversification. The program emphasizes diversification by trading metals,
agricultural products, foreign exchange, stock indices, energy products,
financial instruments and tropical products (softs).

The Diversified Trend-Following Program trades 70 portfolio instruments and is
generally positioned in 45 of these instruments on average. Positions can be
short as well as long. The Diversified Trend-Following Program has no market or
sector bias, as Drury believes that each instrument can produce long-term
profits through the application of independent technical analysis and risk
management.

Graham Capital Management, L.P.

Graham trades its K4D program, a systematic, proprietary trading program on
behalf of Graham Master.

Graham trades actively in both U.S. and foreign markets, primarily in futures
contracts, forward contracts, spot contracts and associated derivative
instruments such as options and swaps. Graham engages in exchange for physical
transactions, which involve the exchange of a futures position for the
underlying physical commodity without making an open competitive trade on an
exchange. Instruments and contracts not traded on an organized exchange may be
entered with banks, brokerage firms or other financial counterparties.

The K4D-15V Program utilizes multiple computerized trading models and offers
broad diversification in both financial and non-financial markets, trading in
approximately 80-90 global markets. It is intended to generate significant
returns over time with an acceptable degree of risk and volatility. The computer
models on a daily basis analyze the recent price action, the relative strength
and the risk characteristics of each market and compare statistically the
quantitative results of this data to years of historical data on each market.

In addition to the trend system or systems at its base, the K4D-15V quantitative
investment program has added numerous other trading strategies developed by
Graham's research department. Graham believes strongly in the importance of
research and development activity and particularly in the development of new
trading strategies and portfolio management techniques. Trading strategies
developed by Graham research and added to Graham investment programs include not
only trend systems but also other styles of systems, with varying time horizons.
Such systems generally are based on computerized mathematical models and can
rely both on technical and fundamental information as the basis for their
trading decisions. Graham intends to add new trading strategies to its
investment programs as well as to modify the systems currently in place in such
programs in its ongoing efforts to keep pace with changing market conditions,
and it anticipates that the constellation of trading strategies comprising each
investment program will continue to grow and evolve over time. The decision to
add or subtract systems or strategies from any investment program shall be at
the sole discretion of Graham.

John W. Henry & Company, Inc.

 JWH traded its JWH Global Analytics Program on behalf of the Partnership, a
proprietary, systematic trading system. Since the firm's inception, the JWH
investment philosophy had been based on the premise that market prices, rather
than market fundamentals, are the key aggregators of information necessary to
make investment decisions and that market prices, which may at first seem
random, are actually related through time in complex, but discernable ways.

Global Analytics invested in both long- and short-term price movements. The
program invested in a broad spectrum of worldwide financial and non-financial
markets, including interest rate, non-U.S. stock index, currency, metals, energy
and agricultural contracts. GlobalAnalytics used JWH's five phase investment
style (a position is maintained, long or short, in a market at all times) and
JWH's three phase investment style (positions are taken when trends are
identified, but the program may take a neutral stance or liquidate open
positions in non-trending markets).

Willowbridge Associates Inc.

As of December 31, 2012, Willowbridge traded its Select Investment Program using
the Argo Trading System ("Argo") on behalf of Willowbridge Master. Argo was a
proprietary, computerized systematic trading system that relied on technical
information. It was not a trend-following system, but did follow a trend when
the opportunity arises. Argo uses the concepts of pattern recognition,
support/resistance levels and counter trend liquidations in making trading
decisions. Argo determines, on a daily basis, whether to be long, short or flat
the various commodities in its portfolio.

 30

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Pattern recognition, support/resistance levels and counter-trend liquidations
are defined as follows:

Pattern recognition is the ability to identify patterns that appear to have
acted as precursors of price advances or declines in the past.

A support level is a previous low-a price level under the current market price
at which point buying interest is expected to be sufficiently strong to overcome
selling pressure.

A resistance level is a previous high-a price level over the current market
price at which point selling pressure is expected to overcome buying pressure
and a price advance is expected to be turned back.

A counter-trend liquidation is the closing out of a position after a significant
price move on the assumption that the market is due for a correction.

Effective January 1, 2013, Willowbridge will trade the Partnership's assets
allocated to it in accordance with its wPraxis Futures Trading Approach
("Praxis").

Praxis will utilize a fully discretionary trading strategy to build a portfolio
consisting of futures on currency, fixed income, stock indices and commodities
pursuant to Praxis. The approach may trade commodities, futures, forwards,
options, spot contracts in commodities, currencies and fixed income markets,
and, in the future, it may trade swaps. All positions are closely monitored to
evaluate risk parameter status. As markets move, positions are refined and
expectations updated in response to current market conditions.

Aspect Capital Limited.

Aspect trades its Diversified Program on behalf of Aspect Master. The
Diversified Program is a proprietary, systematic global futures trading program.
Its goal is the generation of significant medium-term capital growth independent
of stock and bond market returns within a rigorous risk management framework.

The Diversified Program applies a systematic and broadly diversified global
investment system, which deploys multiple investment strategies that, primarily
through the use of derivatives, seek to identify and exploit directional moves
in the market behavior of a broad range of financial instruments and other
assets including (but not limited to) currencies, interest rates, indices, debt
securities (including bonds) and commodities (including energy, metal and
agricultural commodities). By maintaining comparatively small exposure to any
individual market and maintaining positions in a variety of contracts, Aspect
aims to achieve long-term diversification. Generally, the Diversified Program
maintains positions in the majority of traded markets. Market concentration
varies according to the strength of signals, volatility and liquidity, amongst
other factors. The emphasis is upon structuring a genuinely diversified set of
market risk allocations that is designed to maximize the probability of returns
wherever profit opportunities appear. Market exposures are monitored daily and
the level of exposure of the Diversified Program in each market is quantifiable
at all times and changes in accordance with market volatility and liquidity.

The Diversified Program employs an automated system to collect, process and
analyze market data (including current and historical price data) and identify
and exploit directional moves in market behavior. The Diversified Program trades
across a variety of frequencies to exploit trends over a range of timescales.
Positions are taken according to the aggregate signal and are adjusted to
attempt to control risk.

Capital Fund Management S.A.

CFM traded its Discus Program on behalf of CFM Master. The Discus Program was a
proprietary, multi-strategy, 100% statistical and systematic program that sought
to identify prevailing market conditions and adopt the most efficient trading
strategy for those conditions. The strategy at times followed medium to long
term trends, and at other times established short term positions in the
direction of or opposite a trend.

CFM designed the Discus Program to trade a diversified portfolio of
approximately 50 futures and forward contracts among the following sectors:
short, medium and long term interest rates, stock indices, currencies and
commodities.

Altis Partners (Jersey) Limited.

 Altis trades its Global Futures Portfolio Program on behalf of Altis Master.
It is a proprietary, systematic, automated trading system. The Altis Global
Futures Portfolio trading system currently trades in over 100 futures markets on
recognized futures exchanges globally. Altis may add or remove markets from the
trading system in response to changes in market liquidity. Under the fully
automated system, changes in market prices are forecast over a number of future
periods and the portfolio is optimized to take best advantage of these
forecasts. Forecasts are derived from a number of quantitative market phenomena;
for instance, directional movement components look for persistent upward or
downward price movements over a number of time-scales, and anti-trending
components are invoked when such movements may have gone too far too fast. Other
inputs are derived from changes in perceived instrument volatility and the
effect of one market against another closely correlated one.

Under the trading system, the relevant return forecasts, together with their
corresponding measures of risk, and market correlation are re-estimated daily.
Portfolio resources are then allocated to where the approach expects significant
changes in prices, bearing in mind the need to diversify exposure to risk. As a
result, portfolio composition is not fixed; there are no pre-assigned weightings
to markets or sectors. Moreover, no one market is treated differently to its
peers in terms of parameter inputs. Due to the number of inputs or indicators
used, and their application across a broad range of markets, portfolio changes
are generally small, except perhaps during periods of extreme volatility.

Krom River Trading Program.

Krom River trades its Commodity Program on behalf of KR Master, a systematic
trading system that relies on fundamental and technical factors. The Commodity
Program trades in at least 20 different markets including base metals, precious
metals, energy, agricultural and softs. The trade types will include long
volatility, directional and relative value. The trading instruments will be
exchange-listed futures and options, which will be traded on both fundamental
and technical basis. Krom River's Commodity Program will not trade
over-the-counter instruments, nor take physical deliveries.

 31

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Boronia Capital Pty. Ltd.

Boronia trades its Boronia Diversified Program, a systematic trading program, on
behalf of Boronia Trading Company. The trading systems used by Boronia are
proprietary and confidential. The trading systems utilize quantitative
techniques to generate returns in the financial markets. A diversified portfolio
of over 60 liquid markets is traded across 4 asset classes and multiple time
frames using futures on equity, bond, currency and commodity markets plus spot
foreign exchange. Markets may be added or removed from the portfolio over time.

Trades are entered into markets on a fully automated basis directly by computer
to the relevant exchange with no human intervention. The trading decisions are
based on a number of robust and well researched proprietary algorithms developed
by the advisor.

Since the inception of the trading program, Boronia continues to research new
insights and other ways to improve its risk adjusted returns.

Kaiser Trading Group Pty. Ltd.

Kaiser trades its Global Diversified Program, a systematic trading program on
behalf of Kaiser Trading Company. Kaiser takes trading opportunities by using a
systematic, computer based and statistically validated approach built around the
trading psychology of the markets.

The system has four major components: R&D environment, money management, risk
measurement and trading rules. The details of the system in its entirety are
proprietary and confidential. Therefore, the following details are general in
nature.

At present, Kaiser has 22 trading rules in operation. The rules are based on
pattern matching and are short term in nature and include both break and
contrarian models. These rules are traded over 39 different markets including
foreign exchange forward and futures and options on, bonds, global indices,
metals, energy and soft commodities. Each trading rule is the same, using the
same parameters, regardless of the markets traded.

The trading rules are systematically tested over a comprehensive database using
the systems research environment. The criteria that determines whether a trading
rule is to be accepted into the system includes: profitability, robustness,
consistency and diversification. Once a trading rule is accepted into the system
it is integrated using the same money management and risk analytic principles
and software that have been applied to the preceding trading rules.

Risk measurement is accomplished by calculating pertinent risk measures such as
correlation between markets and volatility of markets. These risk measures are
then used to automatically scale trading positions or eliminate other positions.

Money management principles and tools are applied in a similar fashion to each
rule. Entry levels, stop-loss and stop-gain positions are calculated daily.
These are checked and sent to market.

No assurance can be given that the Advisors' strategies will be successful or
that they will generate profits for the Partnership.

Specific Fund level performance information is included in Note 5 to the
financial statements included in Item 8. "Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data."

For the period January 1, 2012 through December 31, 2012, the average allocation
by commodity market sector for each of the Funds was as follows:

 CMF Drury Capital Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 25.4 %
 Energy 11.6 %
 Grains 5.3 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 13.7 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 6.0 %
 Metals 16.0 %
 Softs 3.5 %
 Stock Indices 18.5 %

 32
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 CMF Graham Capital Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 18.5 %
 Energy 8.7 %
 Grains 5.1 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 19.1 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 8.6 %
 Livestock 0.1 %
 Metals 9.0 %
 Softs 3.6 %
 Stock Indices 27.3 %

 CMF Willowbridge Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 23.2 %
 Energy 14.7 %
 Grains 10.2 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 17.1 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 7.3 %
 Livestock 0.6 %
 Metals 20.9 %
 Softs 6.0 %

 CMF Aspect Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 32.2 %
 Energy 8.4 %
 Grains 3.5 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 20.0 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 5.7 %
 Livestock 0.7 %
 Metals 11.7 %
 Softs 3.7 %
 Stock Indices 14.1 %

 CMF Capital Fund Management Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 28.6 %
 Energy 5.1 %
 Grains 4.6 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 16.6 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 9.9 %
 Livestock 0.3 %
 Metals 13.6 %
 Softs 4.0 %
 Stock Indices 17.3 %

 33
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 KR Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 0.0 %*
 Energy 7.1 %
 Grains 15.2 %
 Livestock 1.4 %
 Metals 67.4 %
 Softs 8.9 %

* Due to rounding.

 CMF Altis Partners Master Fund L.P.

 Currencies 16.5 %
 Energy 7.9 %
 Grains 11.0 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 19.6 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 8.3 %
 Livestock 2.6 %
 Metals 14.7 %
 Softs 8.9 %
 Stock Indices 10.5 %

For the period January 1, 2012 through October 31, 2012, the average allocation
by commodity market sector for the portion of the Partnership's assets traded
directly by JWH was as follows:

 Currencies 22.7 %
 Energy 12.3 %
 Grains 6.5 %
 Interest Rates Non-U.S. 14.9 %
 Interest Rates U.S. 8.8 %
 Metals 17.6 %
 Softs 9.6 %
 Stock Index 7.6 %

(a) Liquidity.
The Partnership does not engage in the sales of goods or services. The
Partnership's assets are its (i) investment in Funds, (ii) equity in its trading
account, consisting of cash and cash margin, net unrealized appreciation on open
futures contracts, and (iii) interest receivable. Because of the low margin
deposits normally required in commodity futures trading, relatively small price
movements may result in substantial losses to the Partnership. While substantial
losses could lead to a material decrease in liquidity, no such illiquidity
occurred during the year ended December 31, 2012.

To minimize the risk relating to low margin deposits, the Partnership/Funds
follow certain trading policies, including:

 (i) The Partnership/Funds invests their assets only in commodity interests
 that the Advisors believes are traded in sufficient volume to permit ease
 of taking and liquidating positions. Sufficient volume, in this context,
 refers to a level of liquidity that the Advisor believes will permit it
 to enter and exit trades without noticeably moving the market.

 (ii) An Advisor will not initiate additional positions in any commodity if
 these positions would result in aggregate positions requiring a margin
 of more than 66 2/3% of the Partnership's net assets allocated to that
 Advisor.

 (iii) The Partnership/Funds may occasionally accept physical delivery of a
 commodity. Unless such delivery is disposed of promptly by retendering
 the warehouse receipt representing the delivery to the appropriate
 clearinghouse, the physical commodity position is fully hedged.

 (iv) The Partnership/Funds do not employ the trading technique commonly known
 as "pyramiding," in which the speculator uses unrealized profits on
 existing positions as margin for the purchases or sale of additional
 positions in the same or related commodities.

 (v) The Partnership/Funds do not utilize borrowings other than short-term
 borrowings if the Partnership/Funds take delivery of any cash
 commodities.

 (vi) The Advisors may, from time to time, employ trading strategies such as
 spreads or straddles on behalf of the Partnership/Funds. "Spreads" and
 "Straddles" describe commodity futures trading strategies involving the
 simultaneous buying and selling of futures contracts on the same
 commodity but involving different delivery dates or markets.

 34
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 (vii) The Partnership/Funds will not permit the churning of its commodity
 trading account. The term "churning" refers to the practice of entering
 and exiting trades with a frequency unwarranted by legitimate efforts to
 profit from the trades, indicating the desire to generate commission
 income.

From January 1, 2012 through December 31, 2012, the Partnership's average margin
to equity ratio (i.e., the percentage of assets on deposit required for margin)
was approximately 16.3%. The foregoing margin to equity ratio takes into account
cash held in the Partnership's name, as well as the allocable value of the
positions and cash held on behalf of the Partnership in the name of the Funds.

In the normal course of business, the Partnership and the Funds are parties to
financial instruments with off-balance sheet risk, including derivative
financial instruments and derivative commodity instruments. These financial
instruments include forwards, futures, options and swaps, whose values are based
upon an underlying asset, index or reference rate, and generally represent
future commitments to exchange currencies or cash balances, or to purchase or
sell other financial instruments at specified terms at specified future dates,
or, in the case of derivative commodity instruments, to have a reasonable
possibility to be settled in cash, through physical delivery or with another
financial instrument. These instruments may be traded on an exchange or
over-the-counter ("OTC"). Exchange-traded instruments are standardized and
include futures and certain forwards and option contracts. OTC contracts are
negotiated between contracting parties and include swaps and certain forwards
and option contracts. Each of these instruments is subject to various risks
similar to those relating to the underlying financial instruments including
market and credit risk. In general, the risks associated with OTC contracts are
greater than those associated with exchange-traded instruments because of the
greater risk of default by the counterparty to an OTC contract. The General
Partner estimates that at any given time approximately 9.3% to 29.6% of the
Partnership/Funds' contracts are traded OTC.

The risk to the limited partners that have purchased Redeemable Units is limited
to the amount of their share of the Partnership's assets and undistributed
profits. This limited liability is a result of the organization of the
Partnership as a limited partnership under New York law.

Market risk is the potential for changes in the value of the financial
instruments traded by the Partnership/Funds due to market changes, including
interest and foreign exchange rate movements and fluctuations in commodity or
security prices. Market risk is directly impacted by the volatility and
liquidity in the markets in which the related underlying assets are traded by
the Partnership/Funds. The Partnership/Funds are exposed to a market risk equal
to the value of futures and forward contracts purchased and unlimited liability
on such contracts sold short.

Credit risk is the possibility that a loss may occur due to the failure of a
counterparty to perform according to the terms of a contract. The
Partnership's/Funds' risk of loss in the event of a counterparty default is
typically limited to the amounts recognized in the Statements of Financial
Condition and not represented by the contract or notional amounts of the
instruments. The Partnership's/Funds' risk of loss is reduced through the use of
legally enforceable master netting agreements with counterparties that permit
the Partnership/Funds to offset unrealized gains and losses and other assets and
liabilities with such counterparties upon the occurrence of certain events. The
Partnership/Funds have credit risk and concentration risk as CGM/MS & Co. or a
CGM affiliate is the sole counterparty or broker with respect to the
Partnership's/Funds' assets. Credit risk with respect to exchange-traded
instruments is reduced to the extent that through CGM and MS & Co., the
Partnership's/Funds' counterparty is an exchange or clearing organization.

As both a buyer and seller of options, the Funds pay or receive a premium at the
outset and then bear the risk of unfavorable changes in the price of the
contract underlying the option. Written options expose the Funds to potentially
unlimited liability; for purchased options the risk of loss is limited to the
premiums paid. Certain written put options permit cash settlement and do not
require the option holder to own the reference asset. The Funds do not consider
these contracts to be guarantees.

The General Partner monitors and attempts to control the Partnership's/Funds'
risk exposure on a daily basis through financial, credit and risk management
monitoring systems, and accordingly, believes that it has effective procedures
for evaluating and limiting the credit and market risks to which the
Partnership/Funds may be subject. These monitoring systems generally allow the
General Partner to statistically analyze actual trading results with
risk-adjusted performance indicators and correlation statistics. In addition,
on-line monitoring systems provide account analysis of futures, forwards and
options positions by sector, margin requirements, gain and loss transactions and
collateral positions. (See also "Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data" for further information on financial instrument risk included in the notes
to financial statements.)

Other than the risks inherent in commodity futures and other derivatives
trading, the Partnership knows of no trends, demands, commitments, events or
uncertainties which will result in or which are reasonably likely to result in
the Partnership's liquidity increasing or decreasing in any material way. The
Limited Partnership Agreement provides that the General Partner may, in its
discretion, cause the Partnership to cease trading operations and liquidate all
open positions under certain circumstances including a decrease in net asset
value per Redeemable Unit to less than $400 as of the close of business on any
trading day.

 35

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

(b) Capital Resources.

(i) The Partnership has made no material commitments for capital expenditures.

(ii) The Partnership's capital consists of the capital contributions of the
partners as increased or decreased by gains or losses on trading and by
expenses, interest income, redemptions of Redeemable Units and distributions of
profits, if any. Gains or losses on trading cannot be predicted. Market
movements in commodities are dependent upon fundamental and technical factors
which the Advisors may or may not be able to identify, such as changing supply
and demand relationships, weather, government, agricultural, commercial and
trade programs and policies, national and international political and economic
events and changes in interest rates. Partnership expenses consist of, among
other things, brokerage fees and advisory fees. The level of these expenses is
dependent upon trading performance and the level of Net Assets maintained. In
addition, the amount of interest income payable by CGM is dependent upon
interest rates over which the Partnership/Funds nor CGM/MS&Co have no control.

No forecast can be made as to the level of redemptions in any given period. A
limited partner may require the Partnership to redeem their Redeemable Units at
the net asset value per Redeemable Unit as of the last day of any month on three
business days' notice to the General Partner. There is no fee charged to limited
partners in connection with redemptions. Redemptions generally are funded out of
the Partnership's cash holdings. For the year ended December 31, 2012,
125,271.8658 Redeemable Units were redeemed totaling $126,039,433 as well as
1,516.5660 General Partner unit equivalents redeemed totaling $1,501,899. For
the year ended December 31, 2011, 98,395.4114 Redeemable Units were redeemed
totaling $111,795,813. For the year ended December 31, 2010, 83,328.4812
Redeemable Units were redeemed totaling $96,244,456.

For the year ended December 31, 2012, there were additional subscriptions of
29,524.6495 Redeemable units totaling $30,254,564. For the year ended
December 31, 2011, there were additional subscriptions of 67,129.1576 Redeemable
units totaling $76,224,085. For the year ended December 31, 2010, there were
additional subscriptions of 87,197.4852 Redeemable Units totaling $101,745,934.

(c) Results of Operations.

For the year ended December 31, 2012, the net asset value per unit decreased
13.2% from $1,068.80 to $927.41. For the year ended December 31, 2011, the net
asset value per unit decreased 8.3% from $1,165.28 to $1,068.80. For the year
ended December 31, 2010, the net asset value per unit decreased 3.9% from
$1,212.71 to $1,165.28.

The Partnership experienced a net trading loss of $34,447,602 before brokerage
fees and expenses in 2012. Losses were primarily attributed to the
Partnership's/Funds' trading in currencies, energy, grains, livestock, metals
and softs and were partially offset by gains in U.S. and non-U.S. interest rates
and indices. The net trading gain (or loss) realized from the Partnership's
investment in the Funds is disclosed on page 49 under "Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data."

 The most significant losses were incurred within the metals sector from long
positions in silver and gold futures as prices declined during February on
speculation the U.S. Federal Reserve will refrain from offering additional
stimulus as the economy recovers, eroding demand for the precious metals. Gold
futures prices continued to decline after India, the world's biggest bullion
buyer, increased the tax on imports of precious metals. Additional losses in
this sector were recorded during November from short positions in copper futures
as prices advanced as the strongest Chinese-manufacturing reading in seven
months signaled an economic recovery in the world's biggest consumer of
industrial metals. Within the energy sector, losses were incurred during June,
October, and November from long positions in natural gas futures as prices
declined after a U.S. government report showed an unexpected gain in U.S.
stockpiles as mild weather reduced demand. Elsewhere, losses were incurred from
short positions in crude oil and its related products as prices advanced amid
speculation the conflict between Israel and the Palestinians in Gaza may disrupt
crude supply from the Middle East. Within the soft commodities, losses were
incurred primarily during June and July from short positions in sugar futures as
prices rose on continued concern global supplies will remain limited after wet
weather delayed cane crushing in Brazil. Additional losses in this sector were
recorded during January from short positions in cocoa futures as prices advanced
on speculation supplies will ebb in the Ivory Coast, the world's top producer of
cocoa. Prices of cocoa futures continued to rise after a nationwide strike
spurred concern that supplies would be disrupted in Nigeria, the world's
fourth-largest producer of cocoa. Within the currency sector, losses were
incurred primarily during June and August from short positions in the British
pound versus the U.S. dollar as the value of the British pound advanced as
European Union leaders eased terms on loans to Spanish banks, taking a step
towards resolving the region's debt crisis. Additional losses were incurred
during May from long positions in the British pound. Losses were also incurred
in this sector from short positions in the Canadian dollar and Swiss franc as
the value of these currencies also advanced versus the U.S. dollar. Within the
livestock sector, losses were incurred primarily during September from short
positions in cattle futures as prices rose on signs of shrinking U.S. beef
supplies amid rising demand. Within the agricultural sector, losses were
incurred primarily during September from long positions in corn futures as
prices fell on speculation that U.S. Midwest rain during August limited crop
damage caused by the severe drought in June and July. Losses in this sector were
also incurred from trading wheat futures. A portion of the Partnership's losses
during the year was offset by gains achieved within the global interest rate
sector, primarily during April and May, from long positions in European, U.S.,
and Australian fixed-income futures as prices advanced as Greece failed to form
a unified government, increasing concern Europe's debt crisis was worsening and
spurring demand for the relative "safety" of government debt. Additional profits
from long positions in this sector were recorded during July. Additional gains
were experienced in the global stock index sector, primarily during February,
from long positions in U.S. and European equity index futures as prices rose
amid positive economic news, including a better-than-expected U.S. employment
report and an expansion in manufacturing in China, Europe, and the U.S.
Additional profits from long positions in this sector were recorded during
December.

The Partnership experienced a net trading loss of $2,215,398 before brokerage
fees and expenses in 2011. Losses were primarily attributed to the
Partnership's/Funds' trading in currencies, energy, grains, livestock, metals
and indices and were partially offset by gains in U.S. and non-U.S. interest
rates and softs.

Within the global stock index markets, losses were incurred during March, May,
July, and August. During March, long positions in Pacific Rim and European
equity index futures resulted in losses as prices moved sharply lower after the
tsunami and subsequent nuclear plant disaster in Japan spurred concern about
global economic growth. Additional losses were experienced within this sector
during May from long positions in European, U.S., and Pacific Rim equity index
futures as prices declined on worse-than-expected economic reports and mounting
worries over the European debt crisis. During July and August, long positions in
European, U.S., and Pacific Rim equity index futures resulted in losses as
prices dropped amid ongoing concern about the European sovereign debt crisis and
Standard & Poor's downgrade of the United States' sovereign credit rating.
Within the agricultural complex, losses were incurred primarily during July and
September from long futures positions in corn and soybeans as prices declined on
speculation that Europe's sovereign debt crisis may hinder the global economy,
reducing demand for the grains. Additional losses were experienced within this
sector during December from short futures positions in soybeans and corn as
prices moved higher on concern adverse weather may reduce output in South
America. Within the currency sector, losses were recorded primarily during May
from long positions in the British pound versus the U.S. dollar as the value of
the British pound moved lower against the U.S. dollar after Standard & Poor's
downgraded Greece's credit rating, prompting concern that the European sovereign
debt crisis may escalate. Additional losses were recorded during August and
September from long positions in the Canadian dollar and Australian dollar
versus the U.S. dollar as the value of these "commodity currencies" moved lower
in tandem with declining commodity prices. Further losses were recorded within
the currency sector during October from long positions in the Japanese yen
versus the U.S. dollar as the value of the Japanese yen fell after the Bank of
Japan intervened to weaken Japan's currency for the third time during 2011.
Losses were also experienced within the metals markets, primarily during May and
June, due to long positions in copper, nickel, and aluminum futures as base
metals prices fell as a slowing global economy and a rising U.S. dollar eroded
the appeal of commodities as an investment and eased the risk of accelerating
inflation. Further losses were recorded during October from short positions in
copper futures as prices rose on speculation of increased demand in China, the
world's biggest purchaser of copper. Within the energy complex, losses were
incurred primarily during May from long futures positions in crude oil and its
related products as prices moved lower after signs the global economic recovery
is slowing spurred concern that energy demand may weaken. A portion of the
Partnership's losses during the year was offset by gains recorded within the
global interest rate sector throughout the third quarter from long positions in
U.S., European, and Australian fixed income futures as prices advanced higher
due to concern about the European sovereign debt crisis and a faltering global
economy. Further gains were achieved within this sector during December from
long positions in European and Australian fixed income futures as prices rose on
increased "safe-haven" demand while European leaders struggled to find funding
for the euro-zone rescue plan.

 36

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Interest income on 80% of the average daily equity maintained in cash in the
Partnership's (or the Partnership's allocable portion of a Fund's) brokerage
account was earned at the monthly average 30-day U.S. Treasury bill yield.
Interest income for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2012
increased by $89,885 and $83,058, respectively, as compared to the corresponding
periods in 2011. The increase is due to an increase in the average Treasury bill
rates as compared to the corresponding periods in 2011. Interest earned by the
Partnership will increase the net asset value of the Partnership. The amount of
interest income earned by the Partnership depends on the average daily equity in
the Partnership's and the Funds' accounts and upon interest rates over which
neither the Partnership/Funds nor CGM has control.

Brokerage fees are calculated on the Partnership's adjusted net asset value on
the last day of each month and are affected by trading performance,
subscriptions and redemptions. Accordingly, they must be compared in relation to
the fluctuations in the monthly net asset values. Brokerage fees for the three
and twelve months ended December 31, 2012 decreased by $2,102,087 and
$7,997,331, respectively, as compared to the corresponding periods in 2011. The
decrease in brokerage fees is primarily due to a decrease in average net assets
during the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2012 as compared to the
corresponding periods in 2011.

Management fees are calculated as a percentage of the Partnership's net asset
value as of the end of each month and are affected by trading performance,
subscriptions and redemptions. Management fees for the three and twelve months
ended December 31, 2012 decreased by $746,739 and $2,741,720, respectively, as
compared to the corresponding periods in 2011. The decrease in management fees
is due to a decrease in average net assets during the three and twelve months
ended December 31, 2012 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2011.

Incentive fees are based on the new trading profits generated by each Advisor at
the end of the quarter as defined in the respective management agreements
between the Partnership, the General Partner and each Advisor. There were no
incentive fees earned for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2012.
There were no incentive fees earned for the three months ended December 31,
2011. Trading performance for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 resulted
in incentive fees of $868,682.

The Partnership pays professional fees, which generally include legal and
accounting expenses. Professional fees for the years ended December 31, 2012 and
2011 were $703,214 and $837,729, respectively.

The Partnership pays other expenses, which generally include filing, reporting
and data processing fees. Other expenses for the years ended December 31, 2012
and 2011 were $263,514 and $610,675, respectively.

The Partnership experienced a net trading gain of $29,420,158 before brokerage
fees and expenses in 2010. Gains were primarily attributed to the
Partnership's/Funds' trading in currencies, grains, U.S. and non-U.S. interest
rates, metals and softs and were partially offset by losses in energy, indices
and livestock.

Losses were experienced within the energy markets from long futures positions in
crude oil and its related products as prices declined amid speculation that
China's economic activity and energy demand may ease. Throughout May, long
futures positions in crude oil and its related products resulted in additional
losses as prices declined on continued worries that Europe's debt troubles might
slow down the global economic recovery and thereby weaken energy demand. Losses
were also recorded in short positions in natural gas as prices unexpectedly
rallied due to higher demand for electricity in the summer on higher
temperature. Within the global stock index sector, losses were incurred in
January from long positions in European, U.S., and Pacific Rim equity index
futures as prices moved lower amid disappointing U.S. corporate earnings reports
and mounting concerns over sovereign debt defaults from a number of European
countries. During May and June, further losses were incurred from long positions
in European, U.S., and Japanese equity-index futures as prices moved lower on
growing concerns that Greece's sovereign debt crisis might spread throughout
Europe.

A portion of the Partnership's losses for the year was offset by gains recorded
in the fixed-income sector from long positions in European, U.S., and Japanese
fixed-income futures. In this sector, prices increased during the first quarter
on concerns that lending restrictions in China, possible reductions in U.S.
stimulus measures, and Greece's fiscal struggles might stifle the global
economic rebound. Prices were then pressured higher during the second quarter
amid an unexpected drop in U.S. consumer confidence, increased regulatory
scrutiny of the financial industry, and the growing European debt crisis. During
the third quarter, prices continued to climb higher due to concern that European
governments may struggle to repay their debt and Chinese economic growth may be
slowing. In the metals markets, gains were recorded throughout September,
October, November, and December as long futures positions in silver and gold
resulted in additional gains for the metals sector as prices rose amid increased
demand for the precious metals due to a drop in the value of the U.S. dollar,
with silver futures rallying to a 30-year high and gold prices reaching a new
all-time high. Within the currency markets, gains were achieved primarily during
May, September and December. During May, short positions in the euro versus the
U.S. dollar posted gains as the euro weakened amid concerns over the Greek debt
crisis. During September, long positions in the Australian dollar versus the
U.S. dollar resulted in gains as the value of the Australian dollar rose against
the U.S. dollar amid speculation that the Reserve Bank of Australia may raise
interest rates in October. During December, gains were achieved due to long
positions in the Australian dollar, Canadian dollar, South African rand, and New
Zealand dollar versus the U.S. dollar as the value of these "commodity
currencies" moved higher against the U.S. dollar in tandem with rising commodity
prices.

 37

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the General Partner's opinion, the Advisors continue to employ trading
methods and produce results consistent with their expected performance given
market conditions and the objectives of the Partnership. The General Partner
continues to monitor the Advisors' performance on a daily, weekly, monthly and
annual basis to assure these objectives are met.

Commodity markets are highly volatile. Broad price fluctuations and rapid
inflation increase the risks involved in commodity trading, but also increase
the possibility of profit. The profitability of the Partnership depends on the
existence of major price trends and the ability of certain of the Advisors to
identify those price trends correctly. Price trends are influenced by, among
other things, changing supply and demand relationships, weather, governmental,
agricultural, commercial and trade programs and policies, national and
international political and economic events and changes in interest rates. To
the extent that market trends exist and the Advisors are able to identify them,
the Partnership expects to increase capital through operations.

In allocating the assets of the Partnership among the trading advisors, the
General Partner considers past performance, trading style, volatility of markets
traded and fee requirements. The General Partner may modify or terminate the
allocation of assets among the trading advisors and may allocate assets to
additional advisors at any time. Each Advisor's percentage allocation and
trading program is described in the "overview" section of this Item 7.

(d) Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements. None.

(e) Contractual Obligations. None.

(f) Operational Risk.

The Partnership/Funds are directly exposed to market risk and credit risk, which
arise in the normal course of their business activities. Slightly less direct,
but of critical importance, are risks pertaining to operational and back office
support. This is particularly the case in a rapidly changing and increasingly
global environment with increasing transaction volumes and an expansion in the
number and complexity of products in the marketplace.

Such risks include:

Operational/Settlement Risk - the risk of financial and opportunity loss and
legal liability attributable to operational problems, such as inaccurate pricing
of transactions, untimely trade execution, clearance and/or settlement, or the
inability to process large volumes of transactions. The Partnership/Funds are
subject to increased risks with respect to their trading activities in emerging
markets, where clearance, settlement, and custodial risks are often greater than
in more established markets.

Technological Risk - the risk of loss attributable to technological limitations
or hardware failure that constrain the Partnership's/Funds' ability to gather,
process, and communicate information efficiently and securely, without
interruption, to customers and in the markets where the Partnership/Funds
participate. Additionally, the General Partner's computer systems may be
vulnerable to unauthorized access, mishandling or misuse, computer viruses or
malware, cyber attacks and other events that could have a security impact on
such systems. If one or more of such events occur, this potentially could
jeopardize a limited partner's personal, confidential, proprietary or other
information processed and stored in, and transmitted through, the General
Partner's computer systems, and adversely affect the Partnership's business,
financial condition or results of operations.

Legal/Documentation Risk - the risk of loss attributable to deficiencies in the
documentation of transactions (such as trade confirmations) and customer
relationships (such as master netting agreements) or errors that result in
non-compliance with applicable legal and regulatory requirements.

Financial Control Risk - the risk of loss attributable to limitations in
financial systems and controls. Strong financial systems and controls ensure
that assets are safeguarded, that transactions are executed in accordance with
management's authorization, and that financial information utilized by
management and communicated to external parties, including the Partnership's
unit holders, creditors, and regulators, is free of material errors.

(g) Critical Accounting Policies.

Partnership's and the Funds' Investments. All commodity interests, including
derivative financial instruments and derivative commodity instruments, are held
for trading purposes. The commodity interests are recorded on trade date and
open contracts are

 38

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

recorded at fair value (as described below) at the measurement date. Investments
in commodity interests denominated in foreign currencies are translated into
U.S. dollars at the exchange rates prevailing at the measurement date. Gains or
losses are realized when contracts are liquidated. Unrealized gains or losses on
open contracts are included as a component of equity in trading account on the
Statements of Financial Condition. Net realized gains or losses and any change
in net unrealized gains or losses from the preceding period are reported in the
Statements of Income and Expenses.

Partnership's and the Funds' Fair Value Measurements. Fair value is defined as
the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a
liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the
measurement date under current market conditions. The fair value hierarchy gives
the highest priority to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical
assets or liabilities (Level 1) and the lowest priority to fair values derived
from unobservable inputs (Level 3). The level in the fair value hierarchy within
which the fair value measurement falls in its entirety shall be determined based
on the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value measurement in
its entirety. Management has concluded that based on available information in
the marketplace, the Funds' Level 1 assets and liabilities are actively traded.

Accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
("GAAP") also requires the need to use judgment in determining if a formerly
active market has become inactive and in determining fair values when the market
has become inactive. Management has concluded that based on available
information in the marketplace, there has not been a significant decrease in the
volume and level of activity in the Partnership's and the Funds' Level 2 assets
and liabilities.

The Partnership and the Funds will separately present purchases, sales,
issuances, and settlements in their reconciliation of Level 3 fair value
measurements (i.e., to present such items on a gross basis rather than on a net
basis), and make disclosures regarding the level of disaggregation and the
inputs and valuation techniques used to measure fair value for measurements that
fall within either Level 2 or Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy as required
under GAAP.

Effective January 1, 2012, the Partnership adopted Accounting Standards Update
("ASU") 2011-04, "Amendments to Achieve Common Fair Value Measurement and
Disclosure Requirements in GAAP and International Financial Reporting Standards"
("IFRS"). The amendments within this ASU changed the wording used to describe
many of the GAAP requirements for measuring fair value and for disclosing
information about fair value measurements to eliminate unnecessary wording
differences between GAAP and IFRS. However, some of the amendments clarified the
Financial Accounting Standards Board's (the "FASB") intent about the application
of existing fair value measurement requirements and other amendments changed a
particular principle or requirement for measuring fair value or for disclosing
information about fair value measurements. This new guidance did not have a
significant impact on the Partnership's financial statements.

The Partnership and the Funds consider prices for exchange-traded commodity
futures, forwards and options contracts to be based on unadjusted quoted prices
in active markets for identical assets (Level 1). The values of
non-exchange-traded forwards, swaps and certain options contracts for which
market quotations are not readily available are priced by broker-dealers who
derive fair values for those assets and liabilities from observable inputs
(Level 2). Investments in funds (other commodity pools) where there are no other
rights or obligations inherent within the ownership interest held by the
Partnership are priced based on the end of the day net asset value (Level 2).
The value of the Partnership's investment in the Funds reflects its proportional
interest in the Funds. As of and for the years ended December 31, 2012 and 2011,
the Partnership and the Funds did not hold any derivative instruments that were
priced at fair value using unobservable inputs through the application of
management's assumptions and internal valuation pricing models (Level 3). During
the years ended December 31, 2012 and 2011, there were no transfers of assets
and liabilities between Level 1 and Level 2.

Futures Contracts. The Partnership and the Funds trade futures contracts. A
futures contract is a firm commitment to buy or sell a specified quantity of
investments, currency or a standardized amount of a deliverable grade commodity,
at a specified price on a specified future date, unless the contract is closed
before the delivery date or if the delivery quantity is something where physical
delivery cannot occur (such as the S&P 500 Index), whereby such contract is
settled in cash. Payments ("variation margin") may be made or received by the
Partnership and the Funds each business day, depending on the daily fluctuations
in the value of the underlying contracts, and are recorded as unrealized gains
or losses by the Partnership and the Funds. When the contract is closed, the
Partnership and the Funds record a realized gain or loss equal to the difference
between the value of the contract at the time it was opened and the value at the
time it was closed. Transactions in futures contracts require participants to
make both initial margin deposits of cash or other assets and variation margin
deposits, through the futures broker, directly with the exchange on which the
contracts are traded. Net realized gains (losses) and changes in net unrealized
gains (losses) on futures contracts are included in the Statements of Income and
Expenses.

Forward Foreign Currency Contracts. Forward foreign currency contracts are those
contracts where the Funds agrees to receive or deliver a fixed quantity of
foreign currency for an agreed-upon price on an agreed future date. Forward
foreign currency contracts are valued daily, and the Funds' net equity therein,
representing unrealized gain or loss on the contracts as measured by the
difference between the forward foreign exchange rates at the dates of entry into
the contracts and the forward rates at the reporting date, is included in the
Statements of Financial Condition. Net realized gains (losses) and changes in
net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency contracts are recognized in
the period in which the contract is closed or the changes occur, respectively
and are included in the Statements of Income and Expenses.

The Funds do not isolate that portion of the results of operations arising from
the effect of changes in foreign exchange rates on investments from fluctuations
from changes in market prices of investments held. Such fluctuations are
included in net gain (loss) on investments in the Statements of Income and
Expenses.

London Metals Exchange Forward Contracts. Metal contracts traded on the London
Metals Exchange ("LME") represent a firm commitment to buy or sell a specified
quantity of aluminum, copper, lead, nickel, tin or zinc. LME contracts traded by
the Funds are

 39

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

cash settled based on prompt dates published by the LME. Payments ("variation
margin") may be made or received by the Funds each business day, depending on
the daily fluctuations in the value of the underlying contracts, and are
recorded as unrealized gains or losses by the Funds. A contract is considered
offset when all long positions have been matched with a like number of short
positions settling on the same prompt date. When the contract is closed at the
prompt date, the Funds record a realized gain or loss equal to the difference
between the value of the contract at the time it was opened and the value at the
time it was closed. Transactions in LME contracts require participants to make
both initial margin deposits of cash or other assets and variation margin
deposits, through the broker, directly with the LME. Net realized gains
(losses) and changes in net unrealized gains (losses) on metal contracts are
included in the Statements of Income and Expenses.

Options. The Funds may purchase and write (sell) both exchange-listed and OTC
options on commodities or financial instruments. An option is a contract
allowing, but not requiring, its holder to buy (call) or sell (put) a specific
or standard commodity or financial instrument at a specified price during a
specified time period. The option premium is the total price paid or received
for the option contract. When the Funds write an option, the premium received is
recorded as a liability in the Statements of Financial Condition and
marked-to-market daily. When the Funds purchase an option, the premium paid is
recorded as an asset in the Statements of Financial Condition and
marked-to-market daily. Net realized gains (losses) and changes in net
unrealized gains (losses) on options contracts are included in the Statements of
Income and Expenses.

[ Back To Contact Center Solutions's Homepage ]
















  FREE CONTACT CENTER SOLUTIONS ENEWS  


 










 WATCH: VIDEOS AND WEBINAR REPLAYS








 
 Choosing the Right Speech Analytics Technology
   [02:47]






Modern IVR: Building a Solid Foundation for the Customer Journey:   

 
   [49:45] 






 







 TRY: EBOOKS & BLOGS









5 Ways Financial Institutions Can Bank on SMS 





Asurion Improves the Agent Experience Through Mobility





The Now consumer





 







 LEARN MORE: FEATURED ASSETS









 
NEW!Aberdeen Report - The Intelligent Contact Center





 
Discovering Emerging Trends in Data





 
Maintaining Customer Experience Continuity: From Self-Service to Agent Assisted, Hands-On Dialogues





 
Building an Effective Quality Management Evaluation Form





 
Agent Initiated Contact Consent-based Routing for Outbound Wireless Contact





More







 CONTACT US









 
 Want to learn more about the latest 
contact center solutions for enhancing 
your customer's experience?  Call us 
at 1 888 547 2481 or visit 
www.aspect.com to chat or send 
us an email inquiry.

Or, participate in one of our 
upcoming events.






























GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. (GDFF) 10-K and 10-Q SEC Filings :: Last10K.com






















		 
	




GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P. (GDFF) SEC Filing 10-K Annual report for the fiscal year ending Saturday, December 31, 2016














last10k.com/sec-filings/gdff/0001193125-17-099695.htm



10-K Annual Summary
10-K Annual Report
10-K Exhibits
10-K Statistics




Document and Entity Information - USD ($)12 Months EndedDec. 31, 2016Feb. 28, 2017Jun. 30, 2016Document And Entity Information [Abstract]   Document Type10-K  Amendment Flagfalse  Document Period End DateDec. 31,  2016  Document Fiscal Year Focus2016  Document Fiscal Period FocusFY  Trading SymbolGDFF  Entity Registrant NameGLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P.  Entity Central Index Key0001068237  Current Fiscal Year End Date--12-31  Entity Well-known Seasoned IssuerNo  Entity Current Reporting StatusYes  Entity Voluntary FilersNo  Entity Filer CategoryNon-accelerated Filer  Entity Common Stock, Shares Outstanding 6,442.5138 Entity Public Float  $ 11,178,987






Click to view a specific section in this 10-K Report
View entire 10-K Report
Statements Of Financial Condition
Statements Of Financial Condition (parenthetical)
Schedule Of Investments
Statements Of Income And Expenses
Statements Of Changes In Partners' Capital
Statements Of Changes In Partners' Capital (parenthetical)
Organization
Basis Of Presentation And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies
Agreements
Trading Activities
Fair Value Measurements
Investment In The Funds
Distributions And Redemptions
Financial Highlights
Financial Instrument Risks
Subsequent Events
Basis Of Presentation And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies (policies)
Investment In The Funds (tables)
Financial Highlights (tables)
Organization - Additional Information (detail)
Basis Of Presentation And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies - Additional Information (detail)
Agreements - Additional Information (detail)
Fair Value Measurements - Additional Information (detail)
Investment In The Funds - Additional Information (detail)
Investment In The Funds - Assets, Liabilities And Partners' Capital Of Funds (detail)
Investment In The Funds - Net Investment Income (loss), Trading Results And Net Income (loss) For Funds (detail)
Investment In The Funds - Partnership's Investments In, And Partnership' Pro Rata Share Of Results Of Operations Of, The Funds (detail)
Distributions And Redemptions - Additional Information (detail)
Financial Highlights - Financial Highlights For Limited Partner Class (detail)
Financial Instrument Risks - Additional Information (detail)


 Please wait while we load the requested 10-K Annual report. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                         https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058d10k.htm




Companies may provide additional information to their SEC Filings as exhibits. Click a link below to view an exhibit that was filed with this report:


                    Exhibit 10.1(A) - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex101a.htm



                    Exhibit 10.2(C) - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex102c.htm



                    Exhibit 31.1 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex311.htm



                    Exhibit 31.2 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex312.htm



                    Exhibit 32.1 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex321.htm



                    Exhibit 32.2 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex322.htm



                    Exhibit 99.1 - ADDITIONAL EXHIBITS
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex991.htm



                    Exhibit 99.2 - ADDITIONAL EXHIBITS
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex992.htm



                    Exhibit 99.3 - ADDITIONAL EXHIBITS
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1068237/000119312517099695/d274058dex993.htm






Form Type: Annual
Number of times amended: 0
Accession Number: 0001193125-17-099695
Submitted to the SEC: Tuesday, March 28, 2017
Accepted by the SEC: Tuesday, March 28, 2017
Period Ending: December 2016












Financial Ratios
Intrinsic Value
Financial Stability

















Companies

 Add



1068237




10-K
10-Q




10-K Annual ReportMarch 2017






10-K Annual ReportMarch 2016

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2015

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2014

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2013

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2012

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2011

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2010

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2009

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2008
 




10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2017

10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2016

10-Q Quarterly ReportAugust 2016

10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2016

10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2015
 


GLOBAL DIVERSIFIED FUTURES FUND L.P.

































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












About.com Search - Find it now!
















about.com logo






























About WEB RESULTS


Global Allocation - What are Global Allocation Funds?



internationalinvest.about.com
 opportunities around the world, which means their holdings may be very concentrated in certain areas. As a result, investors should be aware that these funds may not be very diversified . 

Best Performing Global Allocation Funds.


Global allocation funds differ
More »






Global Mutual Funds - Finding the Best Global Mutual Fund



internationalinvest.about.com
Finding the Best Global Mutual Fund.
The Easiest Way to Create a Diversified Portfolio.


Global mutual funds have grown in popularity over the years by giving investors the ability to easily diversify their portfolios. Unlike international funds
More »






Best Amount of Mutual Funds to Be Diversified



mutualfunds.about.com
How Many Mutual Funds Should You Have to Be Diversified?
Best Amount of Mutual Funds for Diversification.


You\ve probably heard the sage advice, "Don\t put all of your eggs into one basket.". But how many baskets should you have? This extends
More »






Investing in Global Value Funds



internationalinvest.about.com
Investing in Global Value Funds.
Diversify Abroad on the Cheap.


Global value funds combine the power of value investing with the diversification of global markets to create some compelling opportunities. These funds attempt to identify companies around
More »








RELATED SEARCHES



Diversified Fund Definition






                        Programs That Help with Funeral Expenses






                        Highest Performing Small-cap Fund






                        Churches That Help Pay Bills






                        Honeyfund Wedding Registry






                        Usaa Value Fund






                        No Money for Burial






                        Sample Bowling League Prize Fund






                        Pag Ibig Fund Website






                        Pag Ibig Contribution






MORE About WEB RESULTS


Global Mutual Funds vs. International Mutual Funds



beginnersinvest.about.com
Global Mutual Funds vs. International Mutual Funds.
Understanding the Difference Between Global Funds and International Funds.


Have you ever come across a "global" mutual fund or an "international" mutual fund and wondered if there is a difference
More »






Build a Solid and Diversified Portfolio with BRICs



internationalinvest.about.com
 in BRICs with International ETFs.


Exchange-traded funds (ETFs) are the easiest way to invest in the BRICs. These funds offer diversified exposure to the BRICs without the risks associated with foreign brokerage accounts and foreign tax laws . Investors
More »






Guide to Global Small Cap Funds



internationalinvest.about.com
Guide to Global Small Cap Funds.
How to Invest in International Small-Cap Funds.


Small-cap stocks provide investors with high-risk, high-reward opportunities that tend to be less correlated with the overall market than large-cap stocks. Global small-cap
More »










1


                        2




                        3




                        4




                        5




                        6




                        7




                        8




                        9




                        10




                        Next »










RELATED SEARCHES



Diversified Fund Definition






                        Programs That Help with Funeral Expenses






                        Highest Performing Small-cap Fund






                        Churches That Help Pay Bills






                        Honeyfund Wedding Registry



















Advertise on About.com

 | 

Our Story

 | 

News & Events

 | 

Careers

 | 

SiteMap

 | 

All Topics

 | 

Reprints

 | 

Help

 | 

Write for About

 | 

User Agreement

 | 

Ethics Policy

 | 

Patent Info.

 | 

Privacy Policy

 | 

Your Ad Choices

 | 

© 2017 About.com. All rights reserved.




















About.com Search - Find it now!
















about.com logo






























About WEB RESULTS


burial



usmilitary.about.com
Information Courtesy of Department of Defense Definition: See emergency burial; group burial; trench burial. See also graves registration.. 


More »






Premature Burial - Urban Legends



urbanlegends.about.com
 were too poorly educated (or incompetent, or both) to tell a living body from a dead one. 

It is also a fact that something of a moral panic concerning premature burials took hold in parts of Europe and North American during the 18th, 19th, and early 20th centuries
More »






The Spiritual Aspects of Green Burial



paganwiccan.about.com
 that be my marker. The gods of my tradition will know where to find me.”. 

In 2010, Circle Cemetery, which is part of the Wisconsin-based Pagan organization Circle Sanctuary , became the first National Pagan Burial Ground in the United States, and one of the first
More »






How to Choose a Funeral Home - Burial Options



dying.about.com
How to Choose a Funeral Home.
What to Know When Planning a Funeral.


When you\re trying to decide on a final resting place for yourself or a loved one who has passed, you may have a few different funeral, burial and aftercare options to choose from
More »








RELATED SEARCHES



                        Government Help for Burial Expense






                        State Funded Burial






Burial Financial Assistance






                        United Burial Fund






                        Federal Burial Assistance






                        Low Income Burial Assistance






                        Social Security Burial Benefit






Burial Benefits for Veterans






Burial Expense Help






Burial Assistance in California






MORE About WEB RESULTS


What Does the Bible Say About Cremation and Burial?



christianity.about.com
What Does the Bible Say About Cremation?
Cremation vs. Burial - A Biblical Perspective.


Cremation Versus Burial - A Christian Perspective.


With the rising cost of funeral expenses today, many people are choosing cremation instead of burial. However
More »






Veterans Burial Locations Available Online



usgovinfo.about.com
 location and phone number, plus the grave’s precise location in the cemetery. 

The home page, "Burial and Memorial Benefits," allows the reader to select the Nationwide Gravesite Locator to begin a search. 

[ Rate of Unemployed Veterans Still Falling ] 

State
More »






burial



usmilitary.about.com
burial.


Definition: See emergency burial; group burial; trench burial. See also graves registration. 


More »










1


                        2




                        3




                        4




                        5




                        6




                        7




                        8




                        9




                        10




                        Next »










RELATED SEARCHES



                        Government Help for Burial Expense






                        State Funded Burial






Burial Financial Assistance






                        United Burial Fund






                        Federal Burial Assistance



















Advertise on About.com

 | 

Our Story

 | 

News & Events

 | 

Careers

 | 

SiteMap

 | 

All Topics

 | 

Reprints

 | 

Help

 | 

Write for About

 | 

User Agreement

 | 

Ethics Policy

 | 

Patent Info.

 | 

Privacy Policy

 | 

Your Ad Choices

 | 

© 2017 About.com. All rights reserved.




















About.com Search - Find it now!
















about.com logo






























About WEB RESULTS


President Grant's Funeral



history1800s.about.com
, and an imposing site in Riverside Park was visited and approved by Grant\s son, who was a colonel in the U.S. Army. 

August 8, 1885, a Saturday, was chosen as the day of the funeral. Grant\s body arrived by train in New York City on the preceding Wednesday. And for two
More »






Funeral Planning After Pregnancy Loss



miscarriage.about.com
. 

What About the Cost? 

Some funeral homes offer low- or no-cost funerals for children. The social worker at your hospital should be able to help you locate one of these funeral homes. If there is no one in your area willing to do the services for free or at a discount
More »






US GRANT



hotels.about.com
US GRANT.
Review of US GRANT.


The century-long history of this grand historic hotel parallels the history of downtown San Diego itself, which grew up and evolved around the hotel\s storied walls. Now owned by the Sycuan band of the Kumeyaay tribe
More »






Amy Grant Biography



christianmusic.about.com
Amy Grant – Biography of a Contemporary Christian Artist.


Amy Grant Born: 

The youngest of four daughters, Amy was born on November 25, 1960 in Augusta, Georgia, but she grew up in Nashville in a Christian home that instilled faith, family values
More »








RELATED SEARCHES



                        Programs That Help with Funeral Expenses






                        Free Funding for Funerals






                        Financial Assistance for Funeral






                        Medicaid Funeral Benefits






                        No Money for a Funeral






                        Government Funeral Grants






                        Help with Funeral Costs






                        Organizations That Help with Funeral Expenses






                        Aid in Funeral Expenses






                        Social Fund Funeral Payment






MORE About WEB RESULTS


Funeral Honors - U.S. Military FAQs



usmilitary.about.com
What do the three bullets represent in military funerals?


Question: What do the three bullets represent in military funerals? 

Answer: 

At military funerals , one often sees three volleys of shots fired in honor of the deceased veteran. This is often
More »






Grant Park Neighborhood Profile



atlanta.about.com
Grant Park Neighborhood Profile.


Grant Park at a Glance: 

Grant Park is one of Atlanta\s oldest intown neighborhoods and the city\s largest Historic District. Located just southeast of downtown, the area is known for its distinctive architecture
More »






Grant



businessmajors.about.com
Grant.


Definition: A type of financial aid that doesn\t have to be repaid. 

Examples: Grenerally, grants are given to undergraduate students. 


More »










1


                        2




                        3




                        4




                        5




                        6




                        7




                        8




                        9




                        10




                        Next »










RELATED SEARCHES



                        Programs That Help with Funeral Expenses






                        Free Funding for Funerals






                        Financial Assistance for Funeral






                        Medicaid Funeral Benefits






                        No Money for a Funeral



















Advertise on About.com

 | 

Our Story

 | 

News & Events

 | 

Careers

 | 

SiteMap

 | 

All Topics

 | 

Reprints

 | 

Help

 | 

Write for About

 | 

User Agreement

 | 

Ethics Policy

 | 

Patent Info.

 | 

Privacy Policy

 | 

Your Ad Choices

 | 

© 2017 About.com. All rights reserved.




















About.com Search - Find it now!
















about.com logo






























About WEB RESULTS


Index Funds vs ETFs - Which Is Best?



mutualfunds.about.com
," because they both involve investing in an underlying benchmark index. In different words the reasons for indexing is that index funds and ETFs beat actively-managed funds in many ways. 

The first and best reason to use index funds or ETFs is for what the investment industry
More »






What is an ETF? | What are ETFs?



etf.about.com
What is an ETF?
What are ETFs?


What is an ETF?


Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) are the middle children of stock trading. They follow their big brother, Index, up, down and all around, but they act more like their little brother, Equity. 

How ETFs
More »






Benefits of an ETF Over a Mutual Fund



etf.about.com
 prices. 

Cost-Effectiveness.
As well as being simplistic investments, ETFs are also more cost-effective than mutual funds. Since shares in a mutual fund are actively traded and the fund itself is actively managed , they sometimes rack up large management fees
More »






Is An ETF Better Than a Mutual Fund?



etf.about.com
 investments and how they function, it’s time to decide which asset is right for you. These articles will be beneficial for your decision process since they give you a perspective from both sides of the investment coin. 

ETFs vs. Mutual Funds by Mark Kennedy Mutual
More »








RELATED SEARCHES



ETF List






                        Gold ETF






ETF Portfolios






                        Silver ETF






                        Top 10 ETFS






                        Top Performing ETFS






                        Vanguard ETF Funds






ETF Definition






                        Dividend ETF List






                        Silver ETF Symbol






MORE About WEB RESULTS


How to Invest in the Best Gold Funds & ETFs



mutualfunds.about.com
How to Invest in the Best Gold Funds & ETFs.
History and Hedge Strategies of Gold.


Gold can be used as a hedge against (or as safe harbor from) inflation, stock market declines and falling currency prices, especially with the US dollar
More »






Russia - Best Stock Funds and ETFs for Investing



mutualfunds.about.com
Investing in Russia With Mutual Funds and ETFs.
Why Invest in Russia and How to Do it.


Why invest in Russia? What are some of the best mutual funds and ETFs offering broad exposure to the Russian market economy? 

The Russian Economy
More »






ETFs vs. Mutual Funds - Understand ETFs vs. Mutual Funds



mutualfunds.about.com
 out their portfolios. Simply put, an examination of the advantages and disadvantages of both ETFs and mutual funds alone will not help you decide whether a particular investment strategy is best for you. 

Passive vs. Active; ETFs vs. Mutual Funds.


If you need to decide
More »










1


                        2




                        3




                        4




                        5




                        6




                        7




                        8




                        9




                        10




                        Next »










RELATED SEARCHES



ETF List






                        Gold ETF






ETF Portfolios






                        Silver ETF






                        Top 10 ETFS



















Advertise on About.com

 | 

Our Story

 | 

News & Events

 | 

Careers

 | 

SiteMap

 | 

All Topics

 | 

Reprints

 | 

Help

 | 

Write for About

 | 

User Agreement

 | 

Ethics Policy

 | 

Patent Info.

 | 

Privacy Policy

 | 

Your Ad Choices

 | 

© 2017 About.com. All rights reserved.




















About.com Search - Find it now!
















about.com logo






























About WEB RESULTS


Mutual Funds Under $100



beginnersinvest.about.com
Mutual Funds Under $100.
Strapped for Cash? These funds will let you invest with $100 or less!


Want to start investing but are strapped for cash? Here I have compiled a list of mutual fund s that offer low initial investment minimums, letting you start
More »






What Is a Balanced Mutual Fund?



beginnersinvest.about.com
What Is a Balanced Mutual Fund?
A Balanced Mutual Fund Diversifies Your Money Between Stocks and Bonds.


Mutual funds are traditionally classified by the asset class of investments they own. Some mutual funds only own stocks . These are called equity
More »






Mutual Funds Definition



useconomy.about.com
What Are Mutual Funds?


Mutual funds are compilations of various types of individual stocks or bonds. 

Types of Mutual Funds.


If you can think of an investment type, there is a fund to cover it. For example, although most funds consist of stocks
More »






Understanding Mutual Fund Fees



mutualfunds.about.com
. Each share class requires a management and operating fee and many share classes charge a 12b-1 fee . 

Mutual Fund Management Fees & Operating Fees.


All share classes of mutual funds carry fees that are paid out of the fund’s assets to the fund’s investment
More »








RELATED SEARCHES



Mutual Fund Stock Symbols






Mutual Fund Symbol Lookup






Mutual Fund Ticker Symbol






                        Ticker Symbol List






                        Stock Symbol Lookup






Mutual Fund Performance






                        Best Mutual Funds






                        Historical Mutual Fund Prices






                        Vanguard Mutual Funds List






                        Fidelity Mutual Funds






MORE About WEB RESULTS


Sector Mutual Funds for Beginners



beginnersinvest.about.com
 into this diversified basket of stocks. 

Investor favorite Vanguard also has a few sector funds. For example, The Vanguard Health Care Fund, which trades under both ticker symbols VGHCX for the investor class shares with a 0.35% expense ratio and $3,000 minimum investment
More »






Do You Know What’s In Your Mutual Fund?



moneyover55.about.com
? 

You can check on the price and income volatility of a fund or stock by going to Yahoo Finance . Type the ticker symbol in the search bar at the top. Then under “Charts” on the left hand side of the screen, click “Interactive”. At the bottom choose “Max” to get a graph
More »






Mutual Fund Definitions



mutualfunds.about.com
 that you need to know: 

Mutual Fund Definition : A mutual fund is an investment security type that enables investors to pool their money together into one professionally managed investment. Mutual funds can invest in stocks, bonds, cash and/or other assets. These underlying
More »










1


                        2




                        3




                        4




                        5




                        6




                        7




                        8




                        9




                        10




                        Next »










RELATED SEARCHES



Mutual Fund Stock Symbols






Mutual Fund Symbol Lookup






Mutual Fund Ticker Symbol






                        Ticker Symbol List






                        Stock Symbol Lookup



















Advertise on About.com

 | 

Our Story

 | 

News & Events

 | 

Careers

 | 

SiteMap

 | 

All Topics

 | 

Reprints

 | 

Help

 | 

Write for About

 | 

User Agreement

 | 

Ethics Policy

 | 

Patent Info.

 | 

Privacy Policy

 | 

Your Ad Choices

 | 

© 2017 About.com. All rights reserved.






















global diversified fund - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Global Diversified Fund - Global Diversified Fund | about.com



Ad
 ·
www.about.com/​fund



Find Global Diversified Fund and Related Articles. Search Now!





Search About.com



About.com Story



1000 Expert Writers




About.com Home



100+ Topics



Trusted Guides





Highly-Rated Foreign Fund - See Performance Results



Ad
 ·
www.franklintempleton.com



Templeton Foreign Fund: Finding value worldwide for over 30 years. See results.





Fund Performance



Fund Overview




Fund Portfolio





Diversified Portfolio - Diversified Portfolio | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​Diversified Portfolio



Find the best articles from across the web and real people on Reference.com!





Browse Education



Browse Health



Browse Finance



Browse Vehicles





Searches related toglobal diversified fund



principal global diversified income


global diversified fund intel


fidelity global diversified fund


fidelity global diversified fund ticker



pgbax fund fact sheet


principal diversified growth fund


principal global




Web Results

401K Global Diversified Fund - OregonLive.com

media.oregonlive.com/finance/other/401K Global Diversified Fund.pdf


Fund Descriptions Global Bond Fund The fund seeks to provide investors protection from both deflation and inflation while providing current income.


PGBAX Fund - Principal Global Diversified Income Fund;A ...

www.marketwatch.com/investing/fund/PGBAX


Mutual fund overview for Principal Global Diversified Income Fund;A (PGBAX), from MarketWatch.


Principal Global Diversified Income Fund | Principal Funds

https://www.principalfunds.com/.../global-diversified-income-fund


Investors need income. And to get it, they may be taking on more risk than they should. The Principal Global Diversified Income Fund takes a yield-focused approach ...


Global Diversified Income Inst Fund as of 06/30/2017

https://www.principal.com/allweb/docs/RIS/investments/factsheet/...


Global Diversified Income Inst Fund as of 06/30/2017 Investment Strategy The investment seeks income. The fund generally invests a majority of its assets in fixed ...


Principal Global Diversified Income Fund (PGBAX)

https://money.usnews.com/funds/mutual-funds/allocation-30-to-50...


See Principal Global Diversified Income Fund (PGBAX) mutual fund ratings from all the top fund analysts in one place. See Principal Global Diversified Income Fund ...


Principal Global Diversified Income Fund Class A (PGBAX ...

performance.morningstar.com/fund/performance-return.action?t=PGBAX


Get fund performance data on Principal Global Diversified Income Fund Class A (PGBAX) including growth, trailing returns, and quarterly and monthly returns.


Tax-Managed Global Diversified Equity Income Fund (EXG ...

https://funds.eatonvance.com/Tax-Managed-Global-Diversified-Equity...


The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.


A&Q Global Diversified Strategies Fund LLC Form D filed ...

form-d.findthecompany.com/...Q-Global-Diversified-Strategies-Fund-LLC


Research private fundraising by A&Q Global Diversified Strategies Fund LLC. Find the details of their July 18, 2017 Form D filing and compare it to their past filings.


PGBAX Quote - Principal Global Diversified Income Fund ...

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/PGBAX:US


Performance charts for Principal Global Diversified Income Fund (PGBAX) including intraday, historical and comparison charts, technical analysis and trend lines.


Principal Funds

https://www.principalfunds.com


View all Mutual Funds & Portfolios . ... Our global reach, ... Principal Funds are distributed by Principal Funds Distributor, Inc. ALPS Distributors, Inc. is the ...










Global Diversified Fund - Global Diversified Fund | about.com



Ad
 ·
www.about.com/​fund



Find Global Diversified Fund and Related Articles. Search Now!





Search About.com



About.com Story



1000 Expert Writers




About.com Home



100+ Topics



Trusted Guides





Highly-Rated Foreign Fund - See Performance Results



Ad
 ·
www.franklintempleton.com



Templeton Foreign Fund: Finding value worldwide for over 30 years. See results.





Fund Performance



Fund Overview




Fund Portfolio





Diversified Portfolio - Diversified Portfolio | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​Diversified Portfolio



Find the best articles from across the web and real people on Reference.com!





Browse Education



Browse Health



Browse Finance



Browse Vehicles




Searches related toglobal diversified fund



principal global diversified income


global diversified fund intel


fidelity global diversified fund


fidelity global diversified fund ticker



pgbax fund fact sheet


principal diversified growth fund


principal global




12345Next






Answers







Companies listed on the New York Stock...



Global Buy-Write Opportunities Fund US Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Global Diversified Equity Income Fund US ECA Marcellus Trust I US Eclipse Resources...

more






Diversified Global Graphics Group



Diversified Global Graphics Group — (DG3) is a printer located in Jersey City, New Jersey. The company also has offices in London, Hong Kong, Manila,...

more






Global Fund for Women



The Global Fund for Women is a non-profit foundation funding women's human rights initiatives. It was founded in 1987 by New Zealander Anne Firth...

more










global diversified fund News






NYC 'Cultural Plan' Will Direct City Arts Funds to Diversifying Orgs



Colorlines

 - Jul 20


The mayor of the country's largest city and arts capital announced a new plan yesterday (July 19) to ensure municipal arts funding goes to the cultural organizations that are working to diversify...

more





Mutual funds get global boost



Bangkokpost.com : Business

 - Jul 19


The Thai mutual fund sector's net asset value rose by 3.6% year-on-year to 4.82 trillion baht in the first half of 2017, largely due to net capital inflows of 138.3 billion baht. Enthusiasm for...

more





GLOBAL FUND MILLIONS GO TO WASTE



Times of Swaziland Front Page

 - Jul 16


MBABANE – The youth has neglected millions of Emalangeni worth of structures built through taxpayers’ money. A number of youth centres have been neglected by the youth resulting in thugs looting...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network








